Indiana, session 2026, HB1288.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-8-1-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. This section does not apply to elections in
2027 and thereafter. A candidate for the office of county assessor
must satisfy the following:
(1) The candidate must have resided in the county for at least one
(1) year before the election, as provided in Article 6, Section 4 of
the Constitution of the State of Indiana.
(2) The candidate must own real property located in the county
upon taking office.
SECTION 2. IC 3-10-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.278-2019,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. The following public officials shall be elected
at the general election before their terms of office expire and every four
(4) years thereafter:
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(1) Clerk of the circuit court.
(2) County auditor.
(3) County recorder.
(4) County treasurer.
(5) County sheriff.
(6) County coroner.
(7) County surveyor.
(8) County assessor. This subdivision does not apply to
elections in 2027 and thereafter.
(9) County commissioner.
(10) County council member.
(11) Township trustee.
(12) Township board member.
(13) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)). This subdivision does not apply to elections in
2027 and thereafter.
(14) Judge of a small claims court.
(15) Constable of a small claims court.
SECTION 3. IC 3-11-2-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The following offices shall be placed on
the general election ballot in the following order after the public
questions described in section 10(a) of this chapter:
(1) Federal and state offices:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States.
(B) United States Senator.
(C) Governor and lieutenant governor.
(D) Secretary of state.
(E) State comptroller (auditor of state).
(F) Treasurer of state.
(G) Attorney general.
(H) United States Representative. If an election to fill a
vacancy in an office of United States Representative under
IC 3-10-8 is held on the same day as the election for the next
term of the same office, the ballot shall list the election to fill
the vacancy in the office immediately after the election for the
next term of the office.
(2) Legislative offices:
(A) State senator.
(B) State representative.
(3) Circuit offices and county judicial offices:
(A) Judge of the circuit court, and unless otherwise specified
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the circuit court.
(B) Judge of the superior court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the superior court.
(C) Judge of the probate court.
(D) Prosecuting attorney.
(E) Clerk of the circuit court.
(4) County offices:
(A) County auditor.
(B) County recorder.
(C) County treasurer.
(D) County sheriff.
(E) County coroner.
(F) County surveyor.
(G) County assessor. This clause does not apply to elections
in 2027 and thereafter.
(H) County commissioner.
(I) County council member.
(5) Township offices:
(A) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)). This clause does not apply to elections in
2027 and thereafter.
(B) Township trustee.
(C) Township board member.
(D) Judge of the small claims court.
(E) Constable of the small claims court.
(6) City offices:
(A) Mayor.
(B) Clerk or clerk-treasurer.
(C) Judge of the city court.
(D) City-county council member or common council member.
(7) Town offices:
(A) Clerk-treasurer.
(B) Judge of the town court.
(C) Town council member.
(b) If a major political party does not nominate a candidate for an
office on a general, municipal, or special election ballot then the county
election board may print "NO CANDIDATE FILED" in the place on
the ballot where the name of the major political party's nominee would
be printed.
SECTION 4. IC 3-13-10-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


2026]. Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to a vacancy in the office of
township assessor not covered by section 1 of this chapter.
(b) A vacancy shall be filled by the county assessor, subject to the
approval of the department of local government finance. Except as
provided in subsection (c), the county assessor shall make the
appointment not later than thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs. If
the vacancy occurred because the elected township assessor failed to
qualify or was removed, the person who is appointed must be of the
same political party as the elected township assessor.
(c) If a vacancy exists because of the death of the township assessor,
the county assessor shall make the appointment required by subsection
(b) not later than thirty (30) days after the county assessor receives
notice of the death under IC 5-8-6. The county assessor may not fill the
vacancy as required by subsection (b) until the county assessor receives
notice of the death under IC 5-8-6.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-1-24 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 24. If a transfer from a township assessor to the county
assessor of the assessment duties prescribed by this article occurs as
described in IC 36-2-15-5(c), a reference to the township assessor in
this article is considered to be a reference to the county assessor.
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-2-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as
otherwise provided by law, Before January 1, 2027, and subject to
subsection (b), all tangible property which is within the jurisdiction of
this state on the assessment date of a year is subject to assessment and
taxation for that year. Notwithstanding any other law, tangible
property which is within the jurisdiction of this state may not be
assessed after December 31, 2026, and property taxes on tangible
property may not be first imposed or first due after December 31,
2027.
(b) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting or
otherwise affecting:
(1) the collection of any property taxes or penalties imposed;
or
(2) any property tax exemptions or property tax deductions
allowed;
under this article or any other law before January 1, 2028.
SECTION 7. IC 6-1.1-2-1.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.111-2014,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the
annual assessment date for tangible property is:
(1) March 1 in a year ending before January 1, 2016; and
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(2) January 1 in a year beginning after December 31, 2015, and
ending before January 1, 2027.
(b) This subsection applies to mobile homes (including
manufactured homes) subject to assessment under IC 6-1.1-7. Mobile
homes are assessed in the year following the year containing the related
assessment date for other property. The annual assessment date for
mobile homes is:
(1) January 15 in a year ending before January 1, 2017; and
(2) January 1 in a year beginning after December 31, 2016, and
ending before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 8. IC 6-1.1-2-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JANUARY
1, 2028]. Sec. 3. The total tax rate to be imposed on each one hundred
dollars ($100) of the assessed value of property shall be determined in
the manner provided by law. Property tax revenues shall be used for
state expenditures and for the support of the political subdivisions of
this state.
SECTION 9. IC 6-1.1-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Before January 1, 2027, and except as
provided in subsection (c), personal property which is owned by a
person who is a resident of this state shall be assessed at the place
where the owner resides on the assessment date of the year for which
the assessment is made.
(b) Before January 1, 2027, and except as provided in subsection
(c), personal property which is owned by a person who is not a resident
of this state shall be assessed at the place where the owner's principal
office within this state is located on the assessment date of the year for
which the assessment is made.
(c) Before January 1, 2027, personal property shall be assessed at
the place where it is situated on the assessment date of the year for
which the assessment is made if the property is:
(1) regularly used or permanently located where it is situated; or
(2) owned by a nonresident who does not have a principal office
within this state.
(d) If a personal property return is filed pursuant to subsection (c),
the owner of the property shall provide, within forty-five (45) days after
the filing deadline, a copy or other written evidence of the filing of the
return to the assessor of the county in which the owner resides. If such
evidence is not filed within forty-five (45) days after the filing
deadline, the county assessor for the area where the owner resides shall
determine if the owner filed a personal property return in the township
or county where the property is situated. If such a return was filed, the
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


property shall be assessed where it is situated. If such a return was not
filed, the county assessor for the area where the owner resides shall
notify the assessor of the township or county where the property is
situated, and the property shall be assessed where it is situated. This
subsection does not apply to a taxpayer who is required by the
department of local government finance to file a summary of the
taxpayer's business tangible personal property returns.
SECTION 10. IC 6-1.1-15-1.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 167, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1.1. (a) A taxpayer may appeal
an assessment of a taxpayer's tangible property by filing a notice in
writing with, before May 10, 2026, the township assessor, or the
county assessor if the township is not served by a township assessor,
and after May 9, 2026, with the county auditor. Except as provided
in subsections (e) and (h), an appeal under this section may raise any
claim of an error related to the following:
(1) The assessed value of the property.
(2) The assessment was against the wrong person.
(3) The approval denial or omission of a deduction, credit,
exemption, abatement, or tax cap.
(4) A clerical, mathematical, or typographical mistake.
(5) The description of the real property.
(6) The legality or constitutionality of a property tax or
assessment.
A written notice under this section must be made on a form designated
by the department of local government finance. A taxpayer must file a
separate petition for each parcel.
(b) A taxpayer may appeal an error in the assessed value of the
property under subsection (a)(1) any time after the official's action, but
not later than the following:
(1) For assessments before January 1, 2019, the earlier of:
(A) forty-five (45) days after the date on which the notice of
assessment is mailed by the county; or
(B) forty-five (45) days after the date on which the tax
statement is mailed by the county treasurer, regardless of
whether the assessing official changes the taxpayer's
assessment.
(2) For assessments of real property, after December 31, 2018, the
earlier of:
(A) June 15 of the assessment year, if the notice of assessment
is mailed by the county before May 1 of the assessment year;
or
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(B) June 15 of the year in which the tax statement is mailed by
the county treasurer, if the notice of assessment is mailed by
the county on or after May 1 of the assessment year.
(3) For assessments of personal property, forty-five (45) days after
the date on which the county mails the notice under
IC 6-1.1-3-20.
A taxpayer may appeal an error in the assessment under subsection
(a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), or (a)(6) not later than three (3) years after
the taxes were first due.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), an appeal under this
section applies only to the tax year corresponding to the tax statement
or other notice of action.
(d) An appeal under this section applies to a prior tax year if a
county official took action regarding a prior tax year, and such action
is reflected for the first time in the tax statement. A taxpayer who has
timely filed a written notice of appeal under this section may be
required to file a petition for each tax year, and each petition filed later
must be considered timely.
(e) A taxpayer may not appeal under this section any claim of error
related to the following:
(1) The denial of a deduction, exemption, abatement, or credit if
the authority to approve or deny is not vested in the county board,
county auditor, county assessor, or township assessor.
(2) The calculation of interest and penalties.
(3) A matter under subsection (a) if a separate appeal or review
process is statutorily prescribed.
However, a claim may be raised under this section regarding the
omission or application of a deduction approved by an authority other
than the county board, county auditor, county assessor, or township
assessor.
(f) The filing of a written notice under this section constitutes a
request by the taxpayer for a preliminary informal meeting with:
(1) in the case of a notice filed before May 10, 2026, the
township assessor, or the county assessor if the township is not
served by a township assessor; and
(2) in the case of a notice filed after May 9, 2026, the county
auditor.
(g) A county or township official, or county auditor, as applicable,
who receives a written notice under this section shall forward the
notice to:
(1) the county board; and
(2) in the case of a notice filed with a county or township
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


official before May 10, 2026, the county auditor. if the taxpayer
raises a claim regarding a matter that is in the discretion of the
county auditor.
(h) A taxpayer may not raise any claim in an appeal under this
section related to the legality or constitutionality of:
(1) a user fee (as defined in IC 33-23-1-10.5);
(2) any other charge, fee, or rate imposed by a political
subdivision under any other law; or
(3) any tax imposed by a political subdivision other than a
property tax.
(i) This subsection applies only to an appeal based on a claim of
error in the determination of property that is or is not eligible for a
standard homestead deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37 and only for an
assessment date occurring before January 1, 2024. A taxpayer may
appeal an error in the assessment of property as described in this
subsection any time after the official's action, but not later than one (1)
year after the date on which the property that is the subject of the
appeal was assessed.
SECTION 11. IC 6-1.1-15-1.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 168, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1.2. (a) A county or township
official, or county auditor, as applicable, who receives a written
notice under section 1.1 of this chapter shall schedule, at a time during
business hours that is convenient to the taxpayer, a preliminary
informal meeting with the taxpayer in order to resolve the appeal. If the
taxpayer raises a claim regarding a matter that is in the discretion of the
county auditor, the An informal meeting held after May 9, 2026, must
include the county auditor, if the county auditor did not receive the
written notice under section 1.1 of this chapter. At the preliminary
informal meeting, in order to facilitate understanding and the resolution
of disputed issues:
(1) a county or township official;
(2) the county auditor; if the matter is in the discretion of the
county auditor; and
(3) the taxpayer;
shall exchange the information that each party is relying on at the time
of the preliminary informal meeting to support the party's respective
position on each disputed issue concerning the assessment or
deduction. If additional information is obtained by the county or
township official, the county auditor, or the taxpayer after the
preliminary informal meeting and before the hearing held by the county
board, the party obtaining the information shall provide the information
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


to the other party. If the county or township official, the county auditor,
or the taxpayer obtains additional information and provides the
information to the other party for the first time at the hearing held by
the county board, the county board, unless waived by the receiving
party, shall continue the hearing until a future hearing date of the
county board so that the receiving party has an opportunity to review
all the information that the offering party is relying on to support the
offering party's positions on the disputed issues concerning the
assessment or deduction.
(b) The official or county auditor, as applicable, shall report on a
form prescribed by the department of local government finance the
results of the informal meeting. If the taxpayer and the official or
county auditor, as applicable, agree on the resolution of all issues in
the appeal, the report shall state the agreed resolution of the matter and
be signed by the official or county auditor, as applicable, and the
taxpayer. If an informal meeting is not held, or the informal meeting is
unsuccessful, the official or county auditor, as applicable, shall
report those facts on the form. The official or county auditor, as
applicable, shall forward the report on the informal meeting to the
county board.
(c) If the county board receives a report on the informal meeting
indicating an agreed resolution of the matter, the county board shall
vote to accept or deny the agreed resolution. If the county board accepts
the agreed resolution, the county board shall issue a notification of final
assessment determination adopting the agreed resolution and vacating
the hearing if scheduled.
(d) The county board, upon receipt of a written notice under section
1.1 of this chapter, shall hold a hearing on the appeal not later than one
hundred eighty (180) days after the filing date of the written notice.
The county board shall, by mail, give at least thirty (30) days notice of
the date, time, and place fixed for the hearing to the taxpayer, the
county or township official with whom the taxpayer filed the written
notice, and the county auditor. If the county board has notice that the
taxpayer is represented by a third person, any hearing notice shall be
mailed to the representative.
(e) If good cause is shown, the county board shall grant a request for
continuance filed in writing at least ten (10) days before the hearing,
and reschedule the hearing under subsection (d).
(f) A taxpayer may withdraw an appeal by filing a written request
at least ten (10) days before the hearing. The county board shall issue
a notification of final assessment determination indicating the
withdrawal and no change in the assessment. A withdrawal waives a
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


taxpayer's right to appeal to the Indiana board.
(g) The county board shall determine an appeal without a hearing if
requested by the taxpayer in writing at least twenty (20) days before the
hearing.
(h) If a taxpayer appeals the assessment of tangible property under
section 1.1 of this chapter, the taxpayer is not required to have an
appraisal of the property in order to initiate the appeal or prosecute the
appeal. If the taxpayer presents an appraisal to the county board that:
(1) is prepared by a certified appraiser in compliance with the
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice to
determine the market value in use;
(2) is addressed to the property owner or the assessor's office;
(3) is commissioned for the purpose of the assessment appeal; and
(4) has an effective date that is the same date as the date of the
assessment that is the subject of the appeal;
the value of the property contained in the appraisal is presumed to be
correct. If the county board disagrees with the taxpayer's appraisal, the
county board may seek review of the appraisal by a third party
independent certified appraiser or obtain an independent appraisal
report conducted by a certified appraiser in compliance with the
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice. If the county
board's appraisal differs from the taxpayer's appraisal, the county board
shall weigh the evidence and determine the true tax value of the
property based on the totality of the probative evidence before the
county board. The county board's determination of the property's true
tax value may be higher or lower than the assessment but may not be
lower than the lowest appraisal presented to or obtained by the county
board, or higher than the highest appraisal presented to or obtained by
the county board. After the assignment of value, the parties shall retain
their rights to appeal the assessment or assessments to the Indiana
board, which must hear the appeal de novo.
(i) At a hearing under subsection (d), the taxpayer shall have the
opportunity to present testimony and evidence regarding the matters on
appeal. If the matters on appeal are in the discretion of the county
auditor, The county auditor or the county auditor's representative shall
attend the hearing. A county or township official, or the county auditor
or the county auditor's representative, shall have an opportunity to
present testimony and evidence regarding the matters on appeal. The
county board may adjourn and continue the hearing to a later date in
order to make a physical inspection or consider the evidence presented.
(j) The county board shall determine the assessment by motion and
majority vote. Except as provided in subsection (m), a county board
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


may, based on the evidence before it, increase an assessment. The
county board shall issue a written decision. Written notice of the
decision shall be given to the township official, county official, county
auditor, and the taxpayer.
(k) If more than one hundred eighty (180) days have passed since
the date the notice of appeal was filed, and the county board has not
issued a determination, a taxpayer may initiate any appeal with the
Indiana board of tax review under section 3 of this chapter.
(l) The county assessor or county auditor, as applicable, may
assess a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) against the taxpayer if the
taxpayer or representative fails to appear at a hearing under subsection
(d) and, under subsection (e), the taxpayer's request for continuance is
denied, or the taxpayer's request for continuance, request for the board
to take action without a hearing, or withdrawal is not timely filed. A
taxpayer may appeal the assessment of the penalty to the Indiana board
or directly to the tax court. The penalty may not be added as an amount
owed on the property tax statement under IC 6-1.1-22 or IC 6-1.1-22.5.
(m) The determination of an appealed assessed value of tangible
property by a county or township official, or county auditor, as
applicable, resulting from an informal meeting under subsection (a),
or by a county board resulting from an appeal hearing under subsection
(d), may be less than or equal to the tangible property's original
appealed assessed value at issue, but may not exceed the original
appealed assessed value at issue. However, an increase in assessed
value that is attributable to substantial renovation, new improvements,
zoning change, or use change is excluded from the limitation under this
subsection.
SECTION 12. IC 6-1.1-15-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) A taxpayer may obtain a review by the
Indiana board of:
(1) a county board's action with respect to a claim under section
1.1 of this chapter; or
(2) a denial by the county auditor, the county assessor, or the
county treasurer of a claim for refund under IC 6-1.1-9-10(c)(2)
that is appealed to the Indiana board as authorized in
IC 6-1.1-26-2.1(d)(2).
(b) The county assessor (before the abolishment of the office) and
the county auditor is the party are parties to a review under
subsection (a)(1) to defend the determination of the county board. The
county auditor may appear as an additional party to the review if the
determination concerns a matter that is in the discretion of the county
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


auditor. At the time the notice of that determination is given to the
taxpayer, the taxpayer shall also be informed in writing of:
(1) the taxpayer's opportunity for review under subsection (a)(1);
and
(2) the procedures the taxpayer must follow in order to obtain
review under this section.
(c) A county assessor or county auditor who dissents from the
determination of the county board may obtain a review by the Indiana
board. A county auditor who dissents from the determination of the
county board concerning a matter that is in the discretion of the county
auditor may obtain a review by the Indiana board.
(d) In order to obtain a review by the Indiana board under
subsection (a)(1), the party must, not later than forty-five (45) days
after the date of the notice given to the party or parties of the
determination of the county board:
(1) file a petition for review with the Indiana board; and
(2) serve a copy of the petition on the other party.
(e) The Indiana board shall prescribe the form of the petition for
review under this chapter. The Indiana board shall issue instructions for
completion of the form. The form and the instructions must be clear,
simple, and understandable to the average individual. A petition for
review of such a determination must be made on the form prescribed
by the Indiana board. The form must require the petitioner to specify
the reasons why the petitioner believes that the determination by the
county board is erroneous.
(f) If the action for which a taxpayer seeks review under this section
is the assessment of tangible property, the taxpayer is not required to
have an appraisal of the property in order to do the following:
(1) Initiate the review.
(2) Prosecute the review.
(g) If an owner petitions the Indiana board under IC 6-1.1-11-7(d),
the Indiana board is authorized to approve or disapprove an exemption
application:
(1) previously submitted to a county board under IC 6-1.1-11-6;
and
(2) that is not approved or disapproved by the county board within
one hundred eighty (180) days after the owner filed the
application for exemption under IC 6-1.1-11.
The county assessor (before the abolishment of the office) and after
May 9, 2026, the county auditor, is a party are parties to a petition
to the Indiana board under IC 6-1.1-11-7(d).
(h) This subsection applies only to the review by the Indiana board
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


of a denial of a refund claim described in subsection (a)(2). The county
assessor (before the abolishment of the office) and after May 9,
2026, the county auditor, is the party are parties to a review under
subsection (a)(2) to defend the denial of the refund under
IC 6-1.1-26-2.1. In order to obtain a review by the Indiana board under
subsection (a)(2), the taxpayer must, within forty-five (45) days of the
notice of denial under IC 6-1.1-26-2.1(d):
(1) file a petition for review with the Indiana board; and
(2) serve a copy of the petition on the county auditor.
SECTION 13. IC 6-1.1-15-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 40, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) After receiving a petition for review
which is filed under section 3 of this chapter, the Indiana board shall
conduct a hearing at its earliest opportunity. The Indiana board may
correct any errors related to a claim under section 1.1 of this chapter
that is within the jurisdiction of the Indiana board under IC 6-1.5-4-1.
(b) If the Indiana board conducts a site inspection of the property as
part of its review of the petition, the Indiana board shall give notice to
all parties of the date and time of the site inspection. The Indiana board
is not required to assess the property in question. The Indiana board
shall give notice of the date fixed for the hearing, by mail, to the parties
or a party's representative. The Indiana board shall give these notices
at least thirty (30) days before the day fixed for the hearing unless the
parties agree to a shorter period. With respect to a petition for review
filed by a county assessor or county auditor, the county board that
made the determination under review under this section may file an
amicus curiae brief in the review proceeding under this section. The
expenses incurred by the county board in filing the amicus curiae brief
shall be paid from the property reassessment fund under
IC 6-1.1-4-27.5 of the county in which the property is located. The
executive of a taxing unit may file an amicus curiae brief in the review
proceeding under this section if the property that is the subject of the
appeal is subject to assessment by that taxing unit.
(c) If a petition for review does not comply with the Indiana board's
instructions for completing the form prescribed under section 3 of this
chapter, the Indiana board shall serve a notice describing the defect in
the petition. The petitioner then has thirty (30) days from the date on
the notice to cure the defect and file a corrected petition. The Indiana
board shall deny a corrected petition for review if it does not
substantially comply with the Indiana board's instructions for
completing the form prescribed under section 3 of this chapter.
(d) After the hearing, the Indiana board shall give the parties and
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


any entity that filed an amicus curiae brief, or their representatives:
(1) notice of its final determination; and
(2) for parties entitled to appeal the final determination, notice of
the procedures they must follow in order to obtain court review
under section 5 of this chapter.
(e) The Indiana board shall conduct a hearing not later than one (1)
year after a petition in proper form is filed with the Indiana board.
(f) The Indiana board shall issue a determination not later than the
later of:
(1) ninety (90) days after the hearing; or
(2) the date set in an extension order issued by the Indiana board.
The board may not extend the date by more than one hundred
eighty (180) days.
(g) The time periods described in subsections (e) and (f) do not
include any period of time that is attributable to a party's:
(1) request for a continuance, stay, extension, or summary
disposition;
(2) consent to a case management order, stipulated record, or
proposed hearing date;
(3) failure to comply with the board's orders or rules; or
(4) waiver of a deadline.
(h) If the Indiana board fails to take action required under
subsection (e) or (f), the entity that initiated the petition may:
(1) take no action and wait for the Indiana board to hear the
matter and issue a final determination; or
(2) petition for judicial review under section 5 of this chapter.
(i) This subsection applies when the board has not held a hearing.
A person may not seek judicial review under subsection (h)(2) until:
(1) the person requests a hearing in writing; and
(2) sixty (60) days have passed after the person requests a hearing
under subdivision (1) and the matter has not been heard or
otherwise extended under subsection (g).
(j) A final determination must include separately stated findings of
fact for all aspects of the determination. Findings of ultimate fact must
be accompanied by a concise statement of the underlying basic facts of
record to support the findings. Findings must be based exclusively
upon the evidence on the record in the proceeding and on matters
officially noticed in the proceeding. Findings must be based upon a
preponderance of the evidence.
(k) The Indiana board may limit the scope of the appeal to the issues
raised in the petition and the evaluation of the evidence presented to
the county board in support of those issues only if all parties
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


participating in the hearing required under subsection (a) agree to the
limitation. A party participating in the hearing required under
subsection (a) is entitled to introduce evidence that is otherwise proper
and admissible without regard to whether that evidence has previously
been introduced at a hearing before the county board.
(l) The Indiana board may require the parties to the appeal:
(1) to file not more than five (5) business days before the date of
the hearing required under subsection (a) documentary evidence
or summaries of statements of testimonial evidence; and
(2) to file not more than fifteen (15) business days before the date
of the hearing required under subsection (a) lists of witnesses and
exhibits to be introduced at the hearing.
(m) A party to a proceeding before the Indiana board shall provide
to all other parties to the proceeding the information described in
subsection (l) if the other party requests the information in writing at
least ten (10) days before the deadline for filing of the information
under subsection (l).
(n) The Indiana board may base its final determination on a
stipulation between the respondent and the petitioner. If the final
determination is based on a stipulated assessed valuation of tangible
property, the Indiana board may order the placement of a notation on
the permanent assessment record of the tangible property that the
assessed valuation was determined by stipulation. The Indiana board
may:
(1) order that a final determination under this subsection has no
precedential value; or
(2) specify a limited precedential value of a final determination
under this subsection.
(o) If a party to a proceeding, or a party's authorized representative,
elects to receive any notice under this section electronically, the notice
is considered effective in the same manner as if the notice had been
sent by United States mail, with postage prepaid, to the party's or
representative's mailing address of record.
(p) At a hearing under this section, the Indiana board shall admit
into evidence an appraisal report, prepared by an appraiser, unless the
appraisal report is ruled inadmissible on grounds besides a hearsay
objection. This exception to the hearsay rule shall not be construed to
limit the discretion of the Indiana board, as trier of fact, to review the
probative value of an appraisal report.
SECTION 14. IC 6-1.1-15-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Not later than fifteen (15) days after the
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


Indiana board gives notice of its final determination under section 4 of
this chapter to the party or the maximum allowable time for the
issuance of a final determination by the Indiana board under section 4
of this chapter expires, a party to the proceeding may request a
rehearing before the Indiana board. The Indiana board may conduct a
rehearing and affirm or modify its final determination, giving the same
notices after the rehearing as are required by section 4 of this chapter.
The Indiana board has fifteen (15) days after receiving a petition for a
rehearing to determine whether to grant a rehearing. Failure to grant a
rehearing not later than fifteen (15) days after receiving the petition
shall be treated as a final determination to deny the petition. A petition
for a rehearing does not toll the time in which to file a petition for
judicial review unless the petition for rehearing is granted. If the
Indiana board determines to rehear a final determination, the Indiana
board:
(1) may conduct the additional hearings that the Indiana board
determines necessary or review the written record without
additional hearings; and
(2) shall issue a final determination not later than ninety (90) days
after notifying the parties that the Indiana board will rehear the
final determination.
If the Indiana board fails to make a final determination within the time
allowed under subdivision (2), the entity that initiated the petition for
rehearing may take no action and wait for the Indiana board to make a
final determination or petition for judicial review under subsection (g).
(b) A party may petition for judicial review of the final
determination of the Indiana board. In order to obtain judicial review
under this section, a party must:
(1) file a petition with the Indiana tax court;
(2) serve a copy of the petition on:
(A) the parties to the review by the Indiana board;
(B) the attorney general; and
(C) any entity that filed an amicus curiae brief with the Indiana
board; and
(3) file a written notice of appeal with the Indiana board
informing the Indiana board of the party's intent to obtain judicial
review.
Petitions for judicial review may be consolidated at the request of the
appellants if it can be done in the interest of justice. The department of
local government finance may intervene in an action taken under this
subsection if the interpretation of a rule of the department is at issue in
the action. The county assessor (before the abolishment of the office)
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


and after May 9, 2026, the county auditor, is a party are parties to
the review under this section.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (g), to initiate a proceeding for
judicial review under this section, a party must take the action required
by subsection (b) not later than:
(1) forty-five (45) days after the Indiana board gives the person
notice of its final determination, unless a rehearing is conducted
under subsection (a); or
(2) forty-five (45) days after the Indiana board gives the person
notice under subsection (a) of its final determination, if a
rehearing is conducted under subsection (a) or the maximum time
elapses for the Indiana board to make a determination under this
section.
(d) The failure of the Indiana board to conduct a hearing within the
period prescribed in section 4(e) of this chapter does not constitute
notice to the party of an Indiana board final determination.
(e) The county assessor or county auditor may petition for judicial
review to the tax court in the manner prescribed in this section. If the
county auditor appeared before the Indiana board concerning the
matter, the county auditor may petition for judicial review to the tax
court in the manner prescribed in this section.
(f) The county assessor or county auditor may not be represented
by the attorney general in a judicial review initiated under subsection
(b) by the county assessor or county auditor.
(g) If the maximum time elapses for the Indiana board to give notice
of its final determination under subsection (a) or section 4 of this
chapter, a party may initiate a proceeding for judicial review by taking
the action required by subsection (b) at any time after the maximum
time elapses. If:
(1) a judicial proceeding is initiated under this subsection; and
(2) the Indiana board has not issued a determination;
the tax court shall determine the matter de novo.
SECTION 15. IC 6-1.1-15-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.244-2015,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 19. (a) Before July 1, 2026, a county
assessor, and after June 30, 2026, a county auditor, shall quarterly
send a notice to the fiscal officer of each taxing unit affected by an
appeal prosecuted under this chapter, including the fiscal officer of an
affected redevelopment commission established under IC 36-7. The
notice must include the following information:
(1) The date on which a notice for review was filed.
(2) The name and address of the taxpayer who filed the notice for
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


review.
(3) The assessed value for the assessment date the year before the
appeal, and the assessed value on the most recent assessment
date.
(4) The status of the taxpayer's appeal.
(b) Each township assessor (if any) shall furnish to the county
assessor all requested information necessary for purposes of providing
the quarterly notices under this section. This subsection expires July
1, 2026.
(c) A notice required by this section may be provided to the
appropriate fiscal officer in an electronic format.
SECTION 16. IC 6-1.1-17-0.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.2. This chapter applies only in
calendar years before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 17. IC 6-1.1-20-0.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.3. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law, after May 9, 2026, a political subdivision may not issue
any bonds, notes, or warrants, or enter into any leases or
obligations to be paid from property tax revenue, or that include
a pledge to levy property taxes if other funds are insufficient.
(b) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 18. IC 6-1.1-39-0.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.2. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law:
(1) no economic development district or allocation area may
be established, amended, or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for an economic development
district or allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
(b) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 19. IC 6-1.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
ARTICLE 1.2. PROPERTY TAX REVENUE REPLACEMENT
Chapter 1. General Applicability and Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions and rules of construction contained in
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


IC 6-1.1-1 apply throughout this article unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
Sec. 2. The definitions contained in this chapter apply
throughout this article unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
Sec. 3. "ADM" has the meaning set forth in IC 20-43-1-6.
Sec. 4. "Allocation area" refers to an area that is established
under the authority of any of the following statutes and in which,
before January 1, 2028, property tax revenues are collected:
(1) IC 6-1.1-39.
(2) IC 8-22-3.5.
(3) IC 36-7-13.
(4) IC 36-7-14.
(5) IC 36-7-14.5.
(6) IC 36-7-15.1.
(7) IC 36-7-30.
(8) IC 36-7-30.5.
(9) IC 36-7-32.
(10) IC 36-7.5-4.5.
(11) Any other provision that authorizes the establishment of
an allocation area in which, before January 1, 2028, property
tax revenues are collected.
Sec. 5. "Fund" refers to the local revenue sharing fund
established by IC 6-1.2-3-2.
Sec. 6. "Governing body" means the following:
(1) For an allocation area created under IC 6-1.1-39, the fiscal
body (as defined in IC 36-1-2-6) of the county.
(2) For an allocation area created under IC 8-22-3.5, the
commission (as defined in IC 8-22-3.5-2).
(3) For an allocation area created under IC 36-7-13, the
county, city, or town.
(4) For an allocation area created under IC 36-7-14, the
redevelopment commission.
(5) For an allocation area created under IC 36-7-14.5, the
redevelopment authority.
(6) For an allocation area created under IC 36-7-15.1, the
metropolitan development commission.
(7) For an allocation area created under IC 36-7-30, the
military base reuse authority.
(8) For an allocation area created under IC 36-7-30.5, the
military base development authority.
(9) For an allocation area created under IC 36-7-32, the
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


redevelopment commission.
(10) For an allocation area created under IC 36-7.5-4.5, the
development authority.
Sec. 7. "Municipality" has the meaning set forth in IC 36-1-2-11.
Sec. 8. "Obligation" means an obligation to repay:
(1) the principal and interest on bonds;
(2) lease rentals on leases; or
(3) any other contractual obligation;
payable from property tax increment revenues. The term includes
a guarantee of repayment from property tax increment revenues
if other revenues are insufficient to make a payment.
Chapter 2. Abolishment of Property Tax
Sec. 1. (a) Notwithstanding IC 6-1.1 or any other law to the
contrary, but subject to subsection (b), tangible property may not
be assessed after December 31, 2026, and property taxes on
tangible property may not be first imposed or first due after
December 31, 2027.
(b) Nothing in this article may be construed as limiting or
otherwise affecting:
(1) the collection of any property taxes or penalties imposed;
or
(2) any property tax exemptions or property tax deductions
allowed;
under IC 6-1.1 or any other law before January 1, 2028.
Sec. 2. If a provision of this article conflicts with any other law,
including IC 6-1.1, the provision in this article controls. A
provision contained in IC 6-1.1 is not applicable after the
abolishment of the imposition of property tax if the context clearly
renders the provision inapplicable.
Sec. 3. This article does not prohibit the assessment and levying
of a fee or payment otherwise authorized by law or the imposing of
a special assessment (including a ditch or drainage assessment,
Barrett Law assessment, improvement assessment, sewer
assessment, or sewage assessment) otherwise authorized by law to
be imposed on property to be benefited by an improvement.
Sec. 4. A pledge of property tax made before May 10, 2026, for
the payment of bonds, leases, or other expenditures shall be treated
as a pledge of the distributions from the fund under this article for
the same purpose. Notwithstanding the abolishment of the
imposition of property tax and the enactment of this article, any
pledge of revenues received from a tax imposed under IC 6-1.1
prior to the abolishment of the imposition of property tax to the
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


payment, in whole or in part, of:
(1) the principal of and interest on bonds;
(2) lease rentals due under a lease; and
(3) the payment of any other obligation;
is binding and enforceable and remains in full force and effect as
long as the principal of and interest on any bonds, the lease rentals
due under any lease, or the payment of any obligation remains
unpaid. The enactment of this article does not affect any rights,
duties, obligations, proceedings, or liabilities accrued before
enactment of this article. Those rights, duties, obligations,
proceedings, or liabilities continue and shall be imposed and
enforced under prior law as if this article had not been enacted and
the imposition of property tax had not been abolished.
Sec. 5. For purposes of limitations on indebtedness of political
or municipal corporations imposed by Article 13, Section 1 of the
Constitution of the State of Indiana, to determine a taxing unit's
value of taxable property after the abolishment of the imposition
of property tax under this article, the most recent assessed value of
taxable property for the entire territory must be used to determine
the debt limit.
Chapter 3. Local Revenue Sharing Fund
Sec. 1. Not later than December 1, 2027, and each December 1
thereafter, each governing body shall file with the department of
local government finance and, if applicable, with the authorizing
unit's executive and fiscal body, a certified report setting out the
amount per month needed to:
(1) make all payments that are due in the next calendar year
on obligations incurred before May 10, 2026, and payable
from property tax revenues in allocation areas; plus
(2) maintain any revenue to obligation payment ratio required
by an agreement on which any of the obligations are based.
The report must be filed in the manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance.
Sec. 2. (a) The local revenue sharing fund is established. The
purpose of the fund is to allocate and distribute to taxing units the
portion of all the state gross retail and use tax revenue attributable
to services for use as set forth in section 4 of this chapter. The fund
shall be administered by the department.
(b) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations to the fund.
(2) Amounts deposited in the fund under IC 6-2.5-10-1(e).
(3) Interest and other earnings derived from investment of
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


money in the fund.
(c) Money in the fund is continuously appropriated for the
purposes of this chapter.
(d) The money in the fund may not be used for the costs of
administering this chapter.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 3. This section applies after December 31, 2027. Before the
last day of each month, the state comptroller shall allocate and the
treasurer of state shall distribute money in the fund to the fiscal
officer of each taxing unit according to the following:
(1) The state comptroller shall first deposit in the local
revenue sharing reserve account established by IC 6-1.2-6-1
an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount in the
fund. However, if the treasurer of state determines under
IC 6-1.2-6-3 that the balance of the local revenue sharing
reserve account is sufficient to make an aggregate monthly
distribution for each of the next twelve (12) months, the state
comptroller shall not make a deposit under this subdivision in
a month until the treasurer of state determines the balance of
the local revenue sharing reserve account is no longer
sufficient to make an aggregate monthly distribution for each
of the next twelve (12) months.
(2) After making the deposit under subdivision (1), the state
comptroller shall distribute an amount equal to forty-five
percent (45%) of the remaining amount in the fund according
to the following formula:
STEP ONE: In collaboration with the department of
education, determine the:
(i) number of students who received a choice scholarship
and not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction
in the current school year; and
(ii) number of students in item (i) who attended each
eligible school in the current school year.
STEP TWO: Add the:
(i) total statewide current ADM of students who receive
not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction for
all school corporations;
(ii) total statewide current ADM of students who receive
not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction for
all charter schools; plus
(iii) number of students who received a choice
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


scholarship and not more than fifty percent (50%)
virtual instruction in the current school year.
STEP THREE: Determine the:
(i) amount that is equal to forty-five percent (45%) of the
amount remaining in the fund; divided by
(ii) STEP TWO result;
to determine per student funding.
STEP FOUR: Distribute to each school corporation,
charter school, and eligible school:
(i) the STEP THREE result; multiplied by
(ii) the current ADM of students who receive not more
than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction for the
school corporation, the current ADM of students who
receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction for the charter school, or the number of
students who received a choice scholarship, did receive
not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction,
and attended the eligible school in the current school
year, as applicable.
(3) After making the distributions under subdivisions (1) and
(2), the state comptroller shall next distribute to each
governing body the amount needed for the subsequent month
as provided in the governing body's report for the calendar
year submitted under section 1 of this chapter.
(4) This subdivision does not apply to school corporations.
After making the distributions under subdivisions (1), (2), and
(3), the state comptroller shall distribute the remaining money
in the fund to taxing units according to the following:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each type of taxing unit the
amount of that particular type of taxing unit's statewide
average net levy for calendar years 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026,
and 2027.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of all five (5) year average
net levy results determined under STEP ONE for all types
of taxing units.
STEP THREE: For each type of taxing unit, determine:
(i) the STEP ONE result for the type of taxing unit;
divided by
(ii) the STEP TWO result.
STEP FOUR: To determine the aggregate allocation
amount for each type of taxing unit, multiply:
(i) the STEP THREE result for the type of taxing unit;
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


by
(ii) the amount of money remaining in the fund after the
distributions under subdivisions (1), (2), and (3).
STEP FIVE: Of the aggregate allocation amount
determined for counties under STEP FOUR, distribute:
(i) seventy-five percent (75%) of the aggregate allocation
amount among the counties proportionately based on the
population of a particular county compared to all
counties; and
(ii) twenty-five percent (25%) of the aggregate allocation
amount among the counties proportionately based on the
total miles of county roads in a particular county
compared to all counties.
STEP SIX: Of the aggregate allocation amount determined
for municipalities under STEP FOUR, distribute:
(i) seventy-five percent (75%) of the aggregate allocation
amount among the municipalities proportionately based
on the population of a particular municipality compared
to all municipalities; and
(ii) twenty-five percent (25%) of the aggregate allocation
amount among the municipalities proportionately based
on the total miles of municipality roads in a particular
municipality compared to all municipalities.
STEP SEVEN: Of the aggregate allocation amount
determined under STEP FOUR for libraries, distribute a
proportionate amount to each library based on the
population of the particular library compared to all
libraries.
STEP EIGHT: Of the aggregate allocation amount
determined under STEP FOUR for townships and fire
protection territories for which a township is the provider
unit, distribute a proportionate amount to the county
auditor in which the township is located based on the
population of the particular township compared to all
townships. The county council in the county in which the
township is located shall determine how to allocate the
money among the townships in the county. In determining
how to allocate the money, the county council may consider
whether one (1) or more townships located in the county
will merge with any other township in the county.
STEP NINE: For all other taxing unit types, respectively,
distribute a proportionate amount to each taxing unit type
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


based on the particular taxing unit type's average net levy
for calendar years 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, and 2027
compared to the average net levy for 2023, 2024, 2025,
2026, and 2027 of all taxing units by type set to receive a
distribution under this subdivision.
If the state comptroller determines that the balance of the fund is
insufficient in any month to make an aggregate distribution under
this section that is equal to the aggregate distribution in the
previous month, money in the local revenue sharing reserve
account established by IC 6-1.2-6-1 shall be used to make up any
shortfall amount.
Sec. 4. (a) Money distributed under section 3(2) and 3(4) of this
chapter must first be used by the respective taxing unit for the
payment of any outstanding bonds, leases, or other expenditures
for which any property tax revenues were pledged prior to the
abolishment of the imposition of property tax under this article.
(b) After a taxing unit makes any required payments described
in subsection (a), money distributed under section 3(2) and 3(4) of
this chapter may be used for any legal purposes of the taxing unit.
Sec. 5. (a) Taxing units are required to fully fund the payment
of their debt obligations in an amount sufficient to pay any debt
service or lease rentals on outstanding obligations, regardless of
any reduction in property tax collections due to the abolishment of
the imposition of property tax under this article.
(b) Upon the failure of a taxing unit to pay any of the taxing
unit's debt service obligations during a calendar year when due,
the treasurer of state, upon being notified of the failure by a
claimant, shall pay the unpaid debt service obligations that are due
from money in the possession of the state that would otherwise be
available for distribution to the taxing unit under any other law,
deducting the payment from the amount distributed. A deduction
under this subsection must be made:
(1) first from local income tax distributions under IC 6-3.6;
and
(2) second from any other undistributed funds of the taxing
unit in the possession of the state.
(c) If a taxing unit or governing body receives insufficient funds
from distributions under section 3 of this chapter and any
interception under subsection (b) to make a required payment on
any outstanding bonds, leases, or other expenditures for which any
property tax revenues were pledged prior to the abolishment of the
imposition of property tax under this article, the state comptroller
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


shall supplement the taxing unit's or governing body's distribution
using money from the state general fund in an amount that, when
combined with the distribution from the fund to the taxing unit or
governing body, does not exceed the amount needed to make the
required payment.
(d) This section shall be interpreted liberally so that the state
shall, to the extent legally valid, ensure that the debt service
obligations of each political subdivision are paid when due.
However, this section does not create a debt of the state.
Chapter 4. School Corporation Referenda Funding
Sec. 1. This chapter applies only:
(1) to a school corporation that imposed:
(A) a controlled project referendum tax levy under
IC 6-1.1-20;
(B) an operating referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-1; or
(C) a school safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9;
that was approved by the voters of the school corporation
before May 10, 2026; and
(2) beginning in calendar year 2028, and in each calendar year
thereafter, until the expiration of the tax levy described in
subdivision (1) as set out when approved by the voters of the
school corporation.
Sec. 2. Each owner of a parcel located in a school corporation's
territory is liable for an annual fee to replace the loss of revenue
previously collected by the school corporation from the imposition
of a controlled project referendum tax levy, an operating
referendum tax levy, or a school safety referendum tax levy prior
to the abolishment of the imposition of property tax under this
article.
Sec. 3. (a) The county treasurer shall mail to the owner of each
parcel located in a school corporation's territory a statement in the
form required under subsection (b).
(b) The department of local government finance shall prescribe
a form, subject to the approval of the state board of accounts, for
the statement under subsection (a) that includes at least the
following:
(1) The total amount owed for the parcel for the year.
(2) Information designed to show the manner in which the fee
is to be used.
(c) The county treasurer shall mail or transmit the statement
one (1) time each year on or before April 15. The statement must
contain the dates on which the first and second installments are
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


due and denote the amount of money to be paid for each
installment.
(d) All payments under this chapter shall be made to the county
treasurer. The county treasurer, when authorized by the board of
county commissioners, may open temporary offices for the
collection of fees in cities and towns in the county other than the
county seat.
(e) The school corporation, county treasurer, and county
auditor shall cooperate to generate the information to be included
in the statement under subsection (b).
(f) The information to be included in the statement under
subsection (b) must be simply and clearly presented and
understandable to the average individual.
Sec. 4. An annual fee due under this chapter is due in two (2)
equal installments on May 10 and November 10 of the calendar
year in the total amount determined in STEP THREE of the
following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the total amount received by the
school corporation from property tax revenue for the
controlled project referendum, operating referendum, or
school safety referendum, or referenda, as applicable, in
calendar year 2027.
STEP TWO: Multiply the STEP ONE result by the net
assessed value for property taxes first due and payable in
2027 for each property.
STEP THREE: Divide the STEP TWO result by the net
assessed value for property taxes first due and payable in
2027 of all tangible property.
Chapter 5. Procedures for Fixing and Reviewing Budgets
Sec. 1. This chapter applies in calendar year 2027 and each
calendar year thereafter.
Sec. 2. Before June 15 of each year, the fiscal officer of each
political subdivision shall provide the department of local
government finance with an estimate of the total amount of the
political subdivision's debt service obligations (as defined in
IC 6-1.1-20.6-9.8) that will be due in the last six (6) months of the
current year and in the ensuing year.
Sec. 3. (a) When formulating an annual budget estimate, the
proper officers of a political subdivision shall prepare an estimate
of the amount of revenue which the political subdivision will
receive from the state for and during the budget year for which the
budget is being formulated. However, this section does not apply
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


to funds to be received from the state or the federal government
for:
(1) township assistance;
(2) unemployment relief;
(3) old age pensions; or
(4) other funds which may at any time be made available
under "The Economic Security Act" or under any other
federal act which provides for civil and public works projects.
(b) When formulating an annual budget estimate, the proper
officers of a political subdivision shall prepare an estimate of the
amount of revenue that the political subdivision will receive under
a development agreement (as defined in IC 36-1-8-9.5) for and
during the budget year for which the budget is being formulated.
Sec. 4. (a) The proper officers of a political subdivision shall
formulate its estimated budget and expected revenue on the form
prescribed by the department of local government finance and
approved by the state board of accounts. In formulating a political
subdivision's estimated budget under this section, the proper
officers of the political subdivision must consider the distributions
from the fund that will be collected by the political subdivision
during the ensuing year, after taking into account the estimate of
miscellaneous revenue that the political subdivision will receive in
the ensuing year, and after taking into account all payments for
debt service obligations that are to be made by the political
subdivision during the ensuing year. The political subdivision shall
submit the following information to the department's computer
gateway:
(1) The estimated budget, including estimated expenditures
and revenue from all sources.
(2) The time and place at which the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body will hold a public hearing on the items
described in subdivision (1).
(3) The time and place at which the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body will meet to fix the budget under
section 5 of this chapter.
(4) The date, time, and place of the final adoption of the
budget under section 5 of this chapter.
Except as provided in section 9(b) of this chapter, the political
subdivision or appropriate fiscal body shall submit this
information to the department's computer gateway at least ten (10)
days before the public hearing required by this subsection in the
manner prescribed by the department. If the date, time, or place of
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


the final adoption subsequently changes, the political subdivision
shall update the information submitted to the department's
computer gateway. The department shall make this information
available to taxpayers, at least ten (10) days before the public
hearing, through its computer gateway and provide a telephone
number through which taxpayers may request mailed copies of a
political subdivision's information under this subsection. The
department's computer gateway must allow a taxpayer to search
for the information under this subsection by the taxpayer's
address. The department shall review only the submission to the
department's computer gateway for compliance with this section.
(b) The board of directors of a solid waste management district
established under IC 13-21 or IC 13-9.5-2 (before its repeal) may
conduct the public hearing required under subsection (a):
(1) in any county of the solid waste management district; and
(2) in accordance with the annual notice of meetings published
under IC 13-21-5-2.
(c) If a political subdivision or appropriate fiscal body timely
submits the information under subsection (a) but subsequently
discovers the information contains an error, the political
subdivision or appropriate fiscal body may submit amended
information to the department's computer gateway. However,
submission of an amendment to information described in
subsection (a)(1) must occur at least ten (10) days before the public
hearing held under subsection (a), and submission of an
amendment to information described in subsection (a)(3) must
occur at least twenty-four (24) hours before the time in which the
meeting to fix the budget, tax rate, and levy was originally
advertised to commence.
Sec. 5. (a) Not later than November 1 each year, the officers of
political subdivisions shall meet each year to fix the budget of their
respective political subdivisions for the ensuing budget year.
Except in a consolidated city and county and in a second class city,
the public hearing required by section 4 of this chapter must be
completed at least ten (10) days before the proper officers of the
political subdivision meet to fix the budget. In a consolidated city
and county and in a second class city, that public hearing, by any
committee or by the entire fiscal body, may be held at any time
after introduction of the budget.
(b) Ten (10) or more taxpayers may object to a budget of a
political subdivision fixed under subsection (a) by filing an
objection petition with the proper officers of the political
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


subdivision not more than seven (7) days after the hearing. The
objection petition must specifically identify the provisions of the
budget to which the taxpayers object.
(c) If a petition is filed under subsection (b), the fiscal body of
the political subdivision shall adopt with its budget a finding
concerning the objections in the petition and any testimony
presented at the adoption hearing.
(d) A political subdivision shall file the budget adopted by the
political subdivision with the department of local government
finance not later than five (5) business days after the budget is
adopted under subsection (a). The filing with the department of
local government finance must be in a manner prescribed by the
department.
(e) In a consolidated city and county and in a second class city,
the clerk of the fiscal body shall, notwithstanding subsection (d),
file the adopted budget and tax ordinances with the department of
local government finance within five (5) business days after the
ordinances are signed by the executive, or within five (5) business
days after action is taken by the fiscal body to override a veto of
the ordinances, whichever is later.
(f) If a fiscal body does not fix the budget of the political
subdivisions for the ensuing budget year as required under this
section, the most recent annual appropriations are continued for
the ensuing budget year.
(g) When fixing a budget under subsection (a), the political
subdivision shall indicate on its adopting document, in the manner
prescribed by the department, whether the political subdivision
intends to issue debt after December 1 of the year preceding the
budget year.
Sec. 6. If an ordinance to fix a city budget is:
(1) vetoed by the city executive under IC 36-4-6-16(a)(2); or
(2) considered vetoed under IC 36-4-6-16(b);
and the veto is effective on a date later than October 1, the city's
legislative body has thirty (30) days from the effective date of the
veto to override the veto in accordance with IC 36-4-6-16(c) to fix
the budget for the ensuing budget year.
Sec. 7. A school corporation shall specify in its proposed budget
the anticipated amount that will be transferred from the total
revenue deposited in the school corporation's education fund to its
operations fund during the next calendar year. At its public
hearing to adopt a budget under this chapter, the school
corporation shall acknowledge whether the school corporation's
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


anticipated transfer amount will be more than fifteen percent
(15%) of the total revenue deposited in the school corporation's
education fund to its operations fund during the next calendar
year.
Sec. 8. (a) Not later than March 2 of each year, the executive of
a political subdivision shall submit a statement to the department
of local government finance attesting that the political subdivision
uploaded any contract entered into during the immediately
preceding year related to the provision of fire services or
emergency medical services to the Indiana transparency website as
required by IC 5-14-3.8-3.5(d).
(b) The department of local government finance may not
approve the budget of a political subdivision or a supplemental
appropriation for a political subdivision until the political
subdivision files the attestation under subsection (a).
Sec. 9. (a) Each school corporation may elect to adopt a budget
under this section that applies from July 1 of the year through June
30 of the following year. In the initial budget adopted by a school
corporation under this section, the first six (6) months of that
initial budget must be consistent with the last six (6) months of the
budget adopted by the school corporation for the calendar year in
which the school corporation elects by resolution to begin adopting
budgets that correspond to the state fiscal year. A corporation shall
submit a copy of the resolution to the department of local
government finance and the department of education not more
than thirty (30) days after the date the governing body adopts the
resolution.
(b) Before April 1 of each year, the officers of the school
corporation shall meet to fix the budget for the school corporation
for the ensuing budget year, with notice given by the same officers.
The school corporation shall submit the information described in
section 4(a) of this chapter to the department's computer gateway
at least ten (10) days before the meeting required by this subsection
in the manner prescribed by the department. The department shall
make this information available to taxpayers at least ten (10) days
before the public hearing through its computer gateway, and
provide a telephone number through which taxpayers may request
mailed copies of a political subdivision's information under this
subsection. However, if a resolution adopted under subsection (d)
is in effect, the officers shall meet to fix the budget for the ensuing
budget year before November 1. A school corporation that adopts
a resolution under subsection (d) shall submit the information
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


described in section 4(a) of this chapter in the manner prescribed
by that section.
(c) A school corporation that adopts a budget as provided in this
section shall file the budget adopted by the school corporation with
the department of local government finance not later than five (5)
business days after the budget is adopted under subsection (b). The
filing with the department of local government finance must be in
a manner prescribed by the department.
(d) The governing body of the school corporation may adopt a
resolution to cease using a school year budget year and return to
using a calendar year budget year. A resolution adopted under this
subsection must be adopted after January 1 and before July 1. The
school corporation's initial calendar year budget year following the
adoption of a resolution under this subsection begins on January
1 of the year following the year the resolution is adopted. The first
six (6) months of the initial calendar year budget for the school
corporation must be consistent with the last six (6) months of the
final school year budget fixed by the department of local
government finance before the adoption of a resolution under this
subsection.
(e) A resolution adopted under subsection (d) may be rescinded
by a subsequent resolution adopted by the governing body. If the
governing body of the school corporation rescinds a resolution
adopted under subsection (d) and returns to a school year budget
year, the school corporation's initial school year budget year
begins on July 1 following the adoption of the rescinding resolution
and ends on June 30 of the following year. The first six (6) months
of the initial school year budget for the school corporation must be
consistent with the last six (6) months of the last calendar year
budget fixed by the department of local government finance before
the adoption of a rescinding resolution under this subsection.
Sec. 10. If the boundaries of a political subdivision cross one (1)
or more county lines, the budget, tax levy, and tax rate fixed by the
political subdivision shall be filed with the county auditor of each
affected county in the manner prescribed in section 5 or 9 of this
chapter.
Chapter 6. Local Revenue Sharing Reserve Account
Sec. 1. (a) The local revenue sharing reserve account is
established for the purpose of ensuring sufficient distributions of
revenue from the fund in times of economic downturn.
(b) The treasurer of state shall administer the account.
(c) The account consists of:
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(1) deposits in the account under IC 6-1.2-3-3; and
(2) interest earned on the balance of the account.
(d) Money in the account at the end of a state fiscal year does
not revert to the state general fund.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the account
not currently needed to meet the obligations of the account in the
same manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the account.
Sec. 2. (a) Each month, the state comptroller shall inform the
state treasurer of the total amount of money distributed under
IC 6-1.2-3-3(2) through IC 6-1.2-3-3(4) in the previous month.
(b) The treasurer of state shall determine whether the balance
of the account is sufficient to make an aggregate monthly
distribution under IC 6-1.2-3-3(2) through IC 6-1.2-3-3(4) for:
(1) each of the next six (6) months; and
(2) each of the next twelve (12) months;
in the amount reported by the state comptroller under subsection
(a).
Sec. 3. (a) If at any time the treasurer of state determines that
the balance of the account is sufficient to make an aggregate
monthly distribution for each of the next twelve (12) months in the
amount reported by the state comptroller under section 2 of this
chapter, the treasurer of state shall inform the state comptroller
and the state department of revenue.
(b) After making a determination described in subsection (a), if
the treasurer of state subsequently determines that the balance of
the account is no longer sufficient to make an aggregate monthly
distribution under IC 6-1.2-3-3(2) through IC 6-1.2-3-3(4) for:
(1) each of the next six (6) months; or
(2) each of the next twelve (12) months;
the treasurer of state shall inform the state comptroller and the
department of state revenue.
SECTION 20. IC 6-2.5-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2020,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) or (c),
"unitary transaction" includes all items of personal property and
services which are furnished under a single order or agreement and for
which a total combined charge or price is calculated.
(b) "Unitary transaction" does not include a transaction that meets
one (1) of the exceptions exception in section 11.5(d) 11.5(c) of this
chapter.
(c) "Unitary transaction" as it applies to the furnishing of public
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


utility commodities or services means the public utility commodities
and services which are invoiced in a single bill or statement for
payment by the consumer.
SECTION 21. IC 6-2.5-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), "gross
retail income" means the total amount of consideration, including cash,
credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property or
a service is sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received
in money or otherwise, without any deduction for:
(1) the seller's cost of the property sold;
(2) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest,
losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed
on the seller, and any other expense of the seller;
(3) charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete
the sale; other than delivery and installation charges;
(4) delivery charges; or
(5) consideration received by the seller from a third party if:
(A) the seller actually receives consideration from a party
other than the purchaser and the consideration is directly
related to a price reduction or discount on the sale;
(B) the seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or
discount through to the purchaser;
(C) the amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is
fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of
the item to the purchaser; and
(D) the price reduction or discount is identified as a third party
price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the
purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation
presented by the purchaser.
For purposes of subdivision (4), delivery charges are charges by the
seller for preparation and delivery of the property to a location
designated by the purchaser of property, including but not limited to
transportation, shipping, postage charges that are not separately stated
on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document, handling, crating, and
packing. Delivery charges do not include postage charges that are
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document.
(b) "Gross retail income" does not include that part of the gross
receipts attributable to:
(1) the value of any tangible personal property received in a like
kind exchange in the retail transaction, if the value of the property
given in exchange is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale,
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


or similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) the receipts received in a retail transaction which constitute
interest or finance charges or insurance premiums on either a
promissory note or an installment sales contract;
(3) discounts, including cash, terms, or coupons that are not
reimbursed by a third party that are allowed by a seller and taken
by a purchaser on a sale;
(4) interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended
on the sale of personal property or services if the amount is
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser;
(5) any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser, including an excise tax imposed under
IC 6-6-15;
(6) installation charges that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
(7) (6) telecommunications nonrecurring charges; or
(8) (7) postage charges that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document. or
(9) charges for serving or delivering food and food ingredients
furnished, prepared, or served for consumption at a location, or on
equipment, provided by the retail merchant, to the extent that the
charges for the serving or delivery are stated separately from the
price of the food and food ingredients when the purchaser pays
the charges.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b)(5):
(1) in the case of retail sales of special fuel (as defined in
IC 6-6-2.5-22) or kerosene (as defined in IC 16-44-2-2), the gross
retail income is the total sales price of the special fuel or kerosene
minus the part of that price attributable to tax imposed under
IC 6-6-2.5 (in the case of special fuel) or Section 4041 or Section
4081 of the Internal Revenue Code (in the case of either special
fuel or kerosene);
(2) in the case of retail sales of cigarettes (as defined in
IC 6-7-1-2), the gross retail income is the total sales price of the
cigarettes including the tax imposed under IC 6-7-1; and
(3) in the case of retail sales of consumable material (as defined
in IC 6-7-4-2), vapor products (as defined in IC 6-7-4-8), and
closed system cartridges (as defined in IC 6-7-2-0.5) under the
closed system cartridge tax, the gross retail income received from
selling at retail is the total sales price of the consumable material
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(as defined in IC 6-7-4-2), vapor products (as defined in
IC 6-7-4-8), and closed system cartridges (as defined in
IC 6-7-2-0.5) including the tax imposed under IC 6-7-4 and
IC 6-7-2-7.5.
(d) Gross retail income is only taxable under this article to the
extent that the income represents
(1) the price of the property transferred without the rendition of
any or the services and
(2) except as provided in subsection (b), any bona fide charges
which are made for preparation, fabrication, alteration,
modification, finishing, completion, delivery, or other service
performed in respect to the property transferred before its transfer
and which are separately stated on the transferor's records. For
purposes of this subdivision, a transfer is considered to have
occurred after the delivery of the property to the purchaser.
performed by the seller, or both.
(e) A public utility's or a power subsidiary's gross retail income
includes all gross retail income received by the public utility or power
subsidiary, including any minimum charge, flat charge, membership
fee, or any other form of charge or billing.
SECTION 22. IC 6-2.5-1-11.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2020,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11.5. (a) This section applies to retail transactions
occurring after December 31, 2007.
(b) (a) "Bundled transaction" means a retail sale of two (2) or more
products or services, except real property and services to real property,
that are:
(1) distinct;
(2) identifiable; and
(3) sold for one (1) nonitemized price.
(c) (b) The term does not include a retail sale in which the sales
price of a product or a service varies, or is negotiable, based on other
products or services that the purchaser selects for inclusion in the
transaction.
(d) (c) The term does not include a retail sale that:
(1) is comprised of:
(A) a service that is the true object of the transaction; and
(B) tangible personal property that:
(i) is essential to the use of the service; and
(ii) is provided exclusively in connection with the service;
(2) (1) includes both taxable and nontaxable products or services
in which:
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(A) the seller's purchase price; or
(B) the sales price;
of the taxable products or services does not exceed ten percent
(10%) of the total purchase price or the total sales price of the
bundled products; or
(3) (2) includes both exempt tangible personal property and
taxable tangible personal property:
(A) any of which is classified as:
(i) food and food ingredients;
(ii) drugs;
(iii) durable medical equipment;
(iv) mobility enhancing equipment;
(v) over-the-counter drugs;
(vi) prosthetic devices; or
(vii) medical supplies; and
(B) for which:
(i) the seller's purchase price; or
(ii) the sales price;
of the taxable tangible personal property is fifty percent (50%)
or less of the total purchase price or the total sales price of the
bundled tangible personal property.
The determination under clause (B) must be made on the basis of
either individual item purchase prices or individual item sale
prices.
(e) (d) A transaction that meets one (1) of the exceptions in
subsection (d) (c) shall be excluded from the definition of unitary
transaction under section 1(a) of this chapter.
SECTION 23. IC 6-2.5-1-22.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22.1. "NAICS code" refers to the
code used to classify a particular industry in the current edition of
the North American Industry Classification System Manual -
United States, published by the National Technical Information
Service of the United States Department of Commerce.
SECTION 24. IC 6-2.5-1-25.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 25.7. (a) "Service" means any
activity engaged in for another person for consideration.
(b) The term does not include either of the following:
(1) A service rendered by an employee for the employee's
employer.
(2) A lease or rental of residential real property for a period
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


of more than thirty (30) days.
SECTION 25. IC 6-2.5-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2024,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) An excise tax, known as the state gross
retail tax, is imposed on retail transactions made in Indiana.
(b) The person who acquires property or receives a service in a
retail transaction is liable for the tax on the transaction and, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, shall pay the tax to the retail
merchant as a separate added amount to the consideration in the
transaction. A retail merchant that has either physical presence in
Indiana as described in subsection (c) or that meets the threshold in
subsection (d) shall collect the tax as agent for the state.
(c) A retail merchant has physical presence in Indiana when the
retail merchant:
(1) maintains an office, place of distribution, sales location,
sample location, warehouse, storage place, or other place of
business which is located in Indiana and which the retail
merchant maintains, occupies, or uses, either permanently or
temporarily, either directly or indirectly, and either by the retail
merchant or through a representative, agent, or subsidiary;
(2) maintains a representative, agent, salesperson, canvasser, or
solicitor who, while operating in Indiana under the authority of
and on behalf of the retail merchant or a subsidiary of the retail
merchant, sells, delivers, installs, repairs, assembles, sets up,
accepts returns of, bills, invoices, or takes orders for sales of
tangible personal property or services to be used, stored, or
consumed in Indiana; or
(3) is otherwise required to register as a retail merchant under
IC 6-2.5-8-1.
(d) A retail merchant that does not have a physical presence in
Indiana shall, as an agent for the state, collect the gross retail tax on a
retail transaction made in Indiana, remit the gross retail tax as provided
in this article, and comply with all applicable procedures and
requirements of this article as if the retail merchant has a physical
presence in Indiana, if the retail merchant's gross revenue from any
combination of:
(1) the sale of tangible personal property that is delivered into
Indiana;
(2) a product transferred electronically into Indiana; or
(3) a service delivered in Indiana;
exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the calendar year
in which the retail transaction is made or for the calendar year
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


preceding the calendar year in which the retail transaction is made.
(e) A marketplace facilitator must include both transactions made
on its own behalf and transactions facilitated for sellers under
IC 6-2.5-4-18 for purposes of establishing the requirement to collect
gross retail tax without having a physical presence in Indiana for
purposes of subsection (d). In addition, except in instances where the
marketplace facilitator has not met the threshold in subsection (d), the
transactions of the seller made through the marketplace are not counted
toward the seller for purposes of determining whether the seller has
met the threshold in subsection (d).
SECTION 26. IC 6-2.5-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2020,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), the
state gross retail tax is measured by the gross retail income received by
a retail merchant in a retail unitary or bundled transaction and is
imposed at seven percent (7%) of that gross retail income.
(b) If the tax computed under subsection (a) carried to the third
decimal place results in the numeral in the third decimal place being
greater than four (4), the amount of the tax shall be rounded to the next
additional cent.
(c) A seller may elect to round the tax under subsection (b) on a
transaction on an item basis or an invoice basis. However, a seller may
not round the tax under subsection (b) to circumvent the tax that would
otherwise be imposed on a transaction using an invoice basis.
(d) If the treasurer of state determines under IC 6-1.2-6-3 at any
time that the balance of the local revenue sharing reserve account
established by IC 6-1.2-6-1 is sufficient to make an aggregate
monthly distribution under IC 6-1.2-3-3(2) through IC 6-1.2-3-3(4)
for each of the next twelve (12) months, the state gross retail tax
imposed on the gross retail income of a service is imposed at six
and seventy-five hundredths percent (6.75%). However, after a
decrease in the tax rate under this subsection, if the treasurer of
state subsequently determines the balance of the local revenue
sharing reserve account is no longer sufficient to make an
aggregate monthly distribution under IC 6-1.2-3-3(2) through
IC 6-1.2-3-3(4) for each of the next six (6) months, the state gross
retail tax imposed on the gross retail income of a service is imposed
at seven percent (7%).
SECTION 27. IC 6-2.5-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2020,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. For purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Use" means either of the following:
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(1) The exercise of any right or power of ownership over tangible
personal property.
(2) The employment of a service for its intended purpose.
(b) "Storage" means the keeping or retention of tangible personal
property in Indiana for any purpose except temporary storage.
(c) "Temporary storage" means the keeping or retention of tangible
personal property in Indiana for a period of not more than one hundred
eighty (180) days and only for the purpose of the subsequent use of that
property solely outside Indiana.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, tangible or
intangible property that is:
(1) owned or leased by a person that has contracted with a
commercial printer for printing; and
(2) located at the premises of the commercial printer;
shall not be considered to be, or to create, an office, a place of
distribution, a sales location, a sample location, a warehouse, a storage
place, or other place of business maintained, occupied, or used in any
way by the person. A commercial printer with which a person has
contracted for printing shall not be considered to be in any way a
representative, an agent, a salesman, a canvasser, or a solicitor for the
person.
SECTION 28. IC 6-2.5-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2016,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) An excise tax, known as the use tax, is
imposed on the storage, use, or consumption of tangible personal
property or the use of a service in Indiana if the property or service
was acquired in a retail transaction, regardless of the location of that
transaction or of the retail merchant making that transaction.
(b) The use tax is also imposed on the storage, use, or consumption
of a vehicle, an aircraft, or a watercraft, if the vehicle, aircraft, or
watercraft:
(1) is acquired in a transaction that is an isolated or occasional
sale; and
(2) is required to be titled, licensed, or registered by this state for
use in Indiana.
(c) The use tax is imposed on a contractor's conversion of
construction material into real property if that construction material
was purchased by the contractor. However, the use tax does not apply
to conversions of construction material described in this subsection, if:
(1) the state gross retail or use tax has been previously imposed
on the contractor's acquisition or use of that construction material;
(2) the person for whom the construction material is being
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


converted could have purchased the material exempt from the
state gross retail and use taxes, as evidenced by a properly issued
exemption certificate, if that person had directly purchased the
construction material from a retail merchant in a retail
transaction; or
(3) the conversion of the construction material into real property
is governed by a time and material contract as described in
IC 6-2.5-4-9(b).
(d) The use tax is imposed on a person who:
(1) manufactures, fabricates, or assembles tangible personal
property from materials either within or outside Indiana; and
(2) uses, stores, distributes, or consumes tangible personal
property in Indiana.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the use tax
is not imposed on the keeping, retaining, or exercising of any right or
power over tangible personal property, if:
(1) the property is delivered into Indiana by or for the purchaser
of the property;
(2) the property is delivered in Indiana for the sole purpose of
being processed, printed, fabricated, or manufactured into,
attached to, or incorporated into other tangible personal property;
and
(3) the property is subsequently transported out of state for use
solely outside Indiana.
(f) As used in subsection (g) and IC 6-2.5-5-42:
(1) "completion work" means the addition of tangible personal
property to or reconfiguration of the interior of an aircraft, if the
work requires the issuance of an airworthiness certificate from
the:
(A) Federal Aviation Administration; or
(B) equivalent foreign regulatory authority;
due to the change in the type certification basis of the aircraft
resulting from the addition to or reconfiguration of the interior of
the aircraft;
(2) "delivery" means the physical delivery of the aircraft
regardless of who holds title; and
(3) "prepurchase evaluation" means an examination of an aircraft
by a potential purchaser for the purpose of obtaining information
relevant to the potential purchase of the aircraft.
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the use tax
is not imposed on the keeping, retaining, or exercising of any right or
power over an aircraft, if:
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(1) the aircraft is or will be titled, registered, or based (as defined
in IC 6-6-6.5-1(m)) in another state or country;
(2) the aircraft is delivered to Indiana by or for a nonresident
owner or purchaser of the aircraft;
(3) the aircraft is delivered to Indiana for the sole purpose of
being repaired, refurbished, remanufactured, or subjected to
completion work or a prepurchase evaluation; and
(4) after completion of the repair, refurbishment, remanufacture,
completion work, or prepurchase evaluation, the aircraft is
transported to a destination outside Indiana.
(h) The amendments made to this section by P.L.153-2012 shall be
interpreted to specify and not to change the general assembly's intent
with respect to this section.
SECTION 29. IC 6-2.5-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.137-2022,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The storage, use, and consumption of
tangible personal property or the use of a service in Indiana is exempt
from the use tax if:
(1) the property or service was acquired in a retail transaction and
the state gross retail tax has been paid on the acquisition of that
property or service; or
(2) the property or service was acquired in a transaction that is
wholly or partially exempt from the state gross retail tax under
any part of IC 6-2.5-5 and the property or service is being used,
stored, or consumed for the purpose for which it was exempted.
(b) If a person issues a state gross retail or use tax exemption
certificate for the acquisition of tangible personal property or a service
and subsequently uses, stores, or consumes that property or service for
a nonexempt purpose, then the person shall pay the use tax.
SECTION 30. IC 6-2.5-3-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. A person is entitled
to a credit against the use tax imposed on the use, storage, or
consumption of a particular item of tangible personal property or the
use of a service equal to the amount, if any, of sales tax, purchase tax,
or use tax paid to another state, territory, or possession of the United
States for the acquisition of that property or service.
SECTION 31. IC 6-2.5-3-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2020,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. (a) For purposes of this section, "person"
includes an individual who is personally liable for use tax under
IC 6-2.5-9-3.
(b) The person who uses, stores, or consumes the tangible personal
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


property or uses the service acquired in a retail transaction is
personally liable for the use tax.
(c) The person liable for the use tax shall pay the use tax to the
department.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c), a person liable for the use tax
imposed in respect to a vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft under section
2(b) of this chapter shall pay the tax:
(1) to the titling agency when the person applies for a title for the
vehicle or the watercraft;
(2) to the registering agency when the person registers the
aircraft; or
(3) to the registering agency when the person registers the
watercraft because it is a United States Coast Guard documented
vessel;
unless the person presents proof to the agency that the use tax or state
gross retail tax has already been paid with respect to the purchase of
the vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft or proof that the taxes are
inapplicable because of an exemption under this article.
(e) At the time a person pays the use tax for the purchase of a
vehicle to a titling agency pursuant to subsection (d), the titling agency
shall compute the tax due based on the presumption that the sale price
was the average selling price for that vehicle, as determined under a
used vehicle buying guide to be chosen by the titling agency. However,
the titling agency shall compute the tax due based on the actual sale
price of the vehicle if the buyer, at the time the buyer pays the tax to the
titling agency, presents documentation to the titling agency sufficient
to rebut the presumption set forth in this subsection and to establish the
actual selling price of the vehicle.
SECTION 32. IC 6-2.5-3-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2007,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. (a) A person who acquires tangible personal
property or a service, or both, from a retail merchant for delivery in
Indiana is presumed to have:
(1) acquired the property for storage, use, or consumption in
Indiana; and
(2) received the service in Indiana.
However, the person or the retail merchant can produce evidence to
rebut that presumption.
(b) A retail merchant is not required to produce evidence of
nontaxability under subsection (a) if the retail merchant receives from
the person who acquired the property or service an exemption
certificate which certifies, in the form prescribed by the department,
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


that the acquisition is exempt from the use tax.
(c) A retail merchant that sells tangible personal property or a
service to a person that purchases the tangible personal property or
service for use or consumption in providing public transportation under
IC 6-2.5-5-27 may verify the exemption by obtaining the person's:
(1) name;
(2) address; and
(3) motor carrier number, United States Department of
Transportation number, or any other identifying number
authorized by the department.
The person engaged in public transportation shall provide a signature
to affirm under penalties of perjury that the information provided to the
retail merchant is correct and that the tangible personal property or
service is being purchased for an exempt purpose.
SECTION 33. IC 6-2.5-3-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) When a retail
merchant collects the use tax from a person, he the retail merchant
shall, upon request, issue a receipt to that person for the use tax
collected.
(b) If the department assesses the use tax against a person for the
person's storage, use, or consumption of tangible personal property or
use of a service in Indiana, and if the person has already paid the use
tax in relation to that property or service to a retail merchant who is
registered under IC 6-2.5-6, to the department, or, in the case of a
vehicle or aircraft, to the proper state agency, then the person may
avoid paying the use tax to the department if he the person can
produce a receipt or other written evidence showing that he the person
has so made the use tax payment.
SECTION 34. IC 6-2.5-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.137-2022,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) A person is a retail merchant making a retail
transaction when the person engages in selling at retail.
(b) A person is engaged in selling at retail when, in the ordinary
course of the person's regularly conducted trade or business, the person
does either of the following:
(1) The person:
(A) acquires tangible personal property for the purpose of
resale; and
(2) (B) transfers that property to another person for
consideration.
(2) The person performs a service for consideration.
(c) For purposes of determining what constitutes selling at retail, it
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


does not matter whether:
(1) the property is transferred or the service is performed in the
same form as when it was acquired;
(2) the property is transferred or the service is performed alone
or in conjunction with other property or services; or
(3) the property is transferred or the service is performed
conditionally or otherwise.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this article, a person is not
making a retail transaction when the person:
(1) acquires tangible personal property owned by another person;
(2) provides industrial processing or servicing, including
enameling or plating, on the property; and
(3) (2) transfers the property back to the owner to be sold by that
owner either in the same form or as a part of other tangible
personal property produced by that owner in the owner's business
of manufacturing, assembling, constructing, refining, or
processing.
SECTION 35. IC 6-2.5-4-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. (a) A person is a
retail merchant making a retail transaction when he the person
regularly and occupationally engages in the business of softening and
conditioning water.
(b) For purposes of this section, the business of softening and
conditioning water includes the exchange of water softening and
conditioning tanks in the ordinary course of the business, but does not
include the preparatory plumbing and work necessary for the first
installation of tanks.
SECTION 36. IC 6-2.5-4-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2016,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) A person is a retail merchant making a retail
transaction:
(1) when the person sells tangible personal property which: or
services;
(1) (2) when the tangible personal property is to be added to a
structure or facility or the service is used to add tangible
personal property to a structure or facility by the purchaser;
and
(2) (3) after its the addition to the structure or facility, the
tangible personal property would become a part of the real
estate on which the structure or facility is located.
(b) A contractor is a retail merchant making a retail transaction
when the contractor:
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(1) disposes of tangible personal property; or
(2) converts tangible personal property into real property;
under a time and material contract. As such a retail merchant, a
contractor described in this subsection shall collect, as an agent of the
state, the state gross retail tax on the resale of the construction material
and remit the state gross retail tax as provided in this article.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a transaction described
in subsection (a) or (b) is not a retail transaction, if the ultimate
purchaser or recipient of the property to be added to a structure or
facility would be exempt from the state gross retail and use taxes if that
purchaser or recipient had directly purchased the property from the
supplier for addition to the structure or facility.
SECTION 37. IC 6-2.5-4-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 111, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. (a) A person, other than a public
utility, is a retail merchant making a retail transaction when the person
rents or leases tangible personal property to another person. other than
for subrent or sublease.
(b) A person is a retail merchant making a retail transaction when
the person sells any tangible personal property which has been rented
or leased in the regular course of the person's rental or leasing business.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person is not a retail merchant
making a retail transaction when the person rents or leases motion
picture film, audio tape, or video tape to another person. However, this
exclusion only applies if:
(1) the person who pays to rent or lease the film charges
admission to those who view the film; or
(2) the person who pays to rent or lease the film or tape
broadcasts the film or tape for home viewing or listening.
(d) (c) The sharing of passenger motor vehicles and trucks through
a peer to peer vehicle sharing program (as defined in IC 24-4-9.2-4) is
a retail transaction.
SECTION 38. IC 6-2.5-4-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) A person is a retail merchant making a
retail transaction when the person furnishes cable television or radio
service or satellite television or radio service that terminates in Indiana.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), A person is not a retail merchant
making a retail transaction when the person provides, installs,
constructs, services, or removes tangible personal property which is
used in connection with the furnishing of cable television or radio
service or satellite television or radio service.
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


SECTION 39. IC 6-2.5-4-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2007,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14. The department of administration and each
purchasing agent for a state educational institution shall provide the
department with a list of every person who desires to enter into a
contract to sell tangible personal property or services to an agency (as
defined in IC 4-13-2-1) or a state educational institution. The
department shall notify the department of administration or the
purchasing agent of the state educational institution if a person on the
list does not have a registered retail merchant certificate or is
delinquent in remitting or paying amounts due to the department under
this article.
SECTION 40. IC 6-2.5-4-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.153-2006,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 15. (a) This section applies to retail transactions
occurring after December 31, 2007.
(b) A person is a retail merchant making a retail transaction when
the person sells tangible personal property or services as part of a
bundled transaction.
SECTION 41. IC 6-2.5-5-21, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2024,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 21. (a) Sales of food and food ingredients, and
delivery of food and food ingredients, are exempt from the state gross
retail tax if:
(1) the seller meets the filing requirements under subsection (c)
and is an organization described in section 25(a)(1) of this
chapter;
(2) the purchaser is a person confined to the purchaser's home
because of age, sickness, or infirmity;
(3) the seller delivers the food and food ingredients to the
purchaser; and
(4) the delivery is prescribed as medically necessary by a
physician licensed to practice medicine in Indiana.
(b) Sales of food and food ingredients, and delivery of food and
food ingredients, are exempt from the state gross retail tax if the seller
is an organization described in section 25(a)(1) of this chapter, and the
purchaser is a patient in a hospital operated by the seller.
(c) To obtain the exemption provided by this section, a taxpayer
must follow the procedures set forth in section 25(c) of this chapter.
SECTION 42. IC 6-2.5-5-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.193-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 26. (a) Sales of tangible personal property or the
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


rendering of services by an organization are exempt from the state
gross retail tax if either of the following apply:
(1) The organization:
(A) is described in section 25(a)(1)(A) through 25(a)(1)(C) of
this chapter, section 25(a)(1)(D)(i) through 25(a)(1)(D)(iii) of
this chapter, or section 25(a)(1)(D)(ix) of this chapter;
(B) makes the sale to make money to carry on a not-for-profit
purpose; and
(C) did not make more than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) in sales in the current calendar year or the previous
calendar year.
(2) The organization:
(A) is described in section 25(a)(1)(D)(iv) through
25(a)(1)(D)(viii) of this chapter; or
(B) is a youth organization focused on agriculture.
Once sales of an organization that meets the qualifications under
subdivision (1), but does not meet the qualifications under subdivision
(2), exceed the amount described in subdivision (1), the organization
is required to collect state gross retail tax on sales on an ongoing basis
for the remainder of the calendar year and each calendar year thereafter
until the organization makes less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) in sales for two (2) consecutive years.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), the sales of an organization
include sales made by all units operating under the organization's
registration pursuant to section 25(c) of this chapter.
(c) If the qualifications of subsection (a) are not met, sales of
tangible personal property or services by an organization described in
section 25(a)(1) of this chapter are exempt from the state gross retail
tax, if:
(1) the organization is not operated predominantly for social
purposes;
(2) the property or service sold is designed and intended
primarily either for the organization's educational, cultural, or
religious purposes, or for improvement of the work skills or
professional qualifications of the organization's members; and
(3) the property or service sold is not designed or intended
primarily for use in carrying on a private or proprietary business.
(d) Sales of tangible personal property by a public library, or a
charitable organization described in section 25(a)(1) of this chapter
formed to support a public library, are exempt from the state gross
retail tax if the property sold consists of:
(1) items in the library's circulated and publicly available
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


collections, including items from the library's holdings; or
(2) items that would typically be included in the library's
circulated and publicly available collections and that are donated
by individuals or organizations to a public library or to a
charitable organization described in section 25(a)(1) of this
chapter formed to support a public library.
The exemption provided by this subsection does not apply to any other
sales of tangible personal property by a public library.
(e) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to an
accredited college or university's sales of books, stationery,
haberdashery, supplies, or other property or noneducational services.
(f) To obtain the exemption provided by this section, a taxpayer
must follow the procedures set forth in section 25(c) of this chapter.
SECTION 43. IC 6-2.5-5-33 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 33. Sales of tangible
personal property or services purchased with food stamps are exempt
from the state gross retail tax.
SECTION 44. IC 6-2.5-5-59 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2027]: Sec. 59. Transactions involving the provision of an
educational service classified under NAICS code 61 are exempt
from the state gross retail tax.
SECTION 45. IC 6-2.5-5-60 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2027]: Sec. 60. Transactions involving the provision of a health
care and social assistance service classified under NAICS code 62
are exempt from the state gross retail tax.
SECTION 46. IC 6-2.5-5-61 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2027]: Sec. 61. Transactions involving the leasing or rental of
real property for at least thirty (30) consecutive days are exempt
from the state gross retail tax.
SECTION 47. IC 6-2.5-5-62 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2027]: Sec. 62. Transactions involving labor furnished to a
person by the person's employee are exempt from the state gross
retail tax.
SECTION 48. IC 6-2.5-6-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) In determining the amount of state gross
retail and use taxes which a retail merchant must remit under section
7 of this chapter, the retail merchant shall, subject to subsections (c)
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


and (d), deduct from the retail merchant's gross retail income from
retail transactions made during a particular reporting period, an amount
equal to the retail merchant's receivables which:
(1) resulted from retail transactions in which the retail merchant
did not collect the state gross retail or use tax from the purchaser;
(2) resulted from retail transactions on which the retail merchant
has previously paid the state gross retail or use tax liability to the
department; and
(3) were written off as an uncollectible debt for federal tax
purposes under Section 166 of the Internal Revenue Code during
the particular reporting period.
(b) If a retail merchant deducts a receivable under subsection (a)
and subsequently collects all or part of that receivable, then the retail
merchant shall, subject to subsection (d)(6), include the amount
collected as part of the retail merchant's gross retail income from retail
transactions for the particular reporting period in which the retail
merchant makes the collection.
(c) This subsection applies only to retail transactions occurring after
December 31, 2006. As used in this subsection, "affiliated group"
means any combination of the following:
(1) An affiliated group within the meaning provided in Section
1504 of the Internal Revenue Code (except that the ownership
percentage in Section 1504(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code
shall be determined using fifty percent (50%) instead of eighty
percent (80%)) or a relationship described in Section 267(b)(11)
of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) Two (2) or more partnerships (as defined in IC 6-3-1-19),
including limited liability companies and limited liability
partnerships, that have the same degree of mutual ownership as
an affiliated group described in subdivision (1), as determined
under the rules adopted by the department.
The right to a deduction under this section is not assignable to an
individual or entity that is not part of the same affiliated group as the
assignor.
(d) The following provisions apply to a deduction for a receivable
treated as uncollectible debt under subsection (a):
(1) The deduction does not include interest.
(2) The amount of the deduction shall be determined in the
manner provided by Section 166 of the Internal Revenue Code for
bad debts but shall be adjusted to exclude:
(A) financing charges or interest;
(B) sales or use taxes charged on the purchase price;
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(C) uncollectible amounts on property that remain in the
possession of the seller or a service that is not delivered until
the full purchase price is paid;
(D) expenses incurred in attempting to collect any debt; and
(E) repossessed property.
(3) The deduction shall be claimed on the return for the period
during which the receivable is written off as uncollectible in the
claimant's books and records and is eligible to be deducted for
federal income tax purposes. For purposes of this subdivision, a
claimant who is not required to file federal income tax returns
may deduct an uncollectible receivable on a return filed for the
period in which the receivable is written off as uncollectible in the
claimant's books and records and would be eligible for a bad debt
deduction for federal income tax purposes if the claimant were
required to file a federal income tax return.
(4) If the amount of uncollectible receivables claimed as a
deduction by a retail merchant for a particular reporting period
exceeds the amount of the retail merchant's taxable sales for that
reporting period, the retail merchant may file a refund claim
under IC 6-8.1-9. However, the deadline for the refund claim shall
be measured from the due date of the return for the reporting
period on which the deduction for the uncollectible receivables
could first be claimed.
(5) If a retail merchant's filing responsibilities have been assumed
by a certified service provider (as defined in IC 6-2.5-11-2), the
certified service provider may claim, on behalf of the retail
merchant, any deduction or refund for uncollectible receivables
provided by this section. The certified service provider must
credit or refund the full amount of any deduction or refund
received to the retail merchant.
(6) For purposes of reporting a payment received on a previously
claimed uncollectible receivable, any payments made on a debt or
account shall be applied first proportionally to the taxable price
of the property or service and the state gross retail tax or use tax
thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges, and any other
charges.
(7) A retail merchant claiming a deduction for an uncollectible
receivable may allocate that receivable among the states that are
members of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement if the
books and records of the retail merchant support that allocation.
SECTION 49. IC 6-2.5-8-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) An organization
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


exempt from the state gross retail tax under IC 6-2.5-5-21,
IC 6-2.5-5-25, or IC 6-2.5-5-26 may register with the department as a
purchaser of property or services in exempt transactions. An exempt
organization wishing to register must file an application listing its
principal location, but the organization is not required to pay the fee.
(b) Upon receiving the application, the department may issue an
exempt organization certificate containing a serial number and the
principal location of the exempt organization.
SECTION 50. IC 6-2.5-10-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 93, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) The department shall account for all state
gross retail and use taxes that it collects.
(b) Of all the state gross retail and use taxes that the department
collects, the department shall determine separately the parts that:
(1) the department collects under IC 6-2.5-3.5 (gasoline use tax);
(2) the department collects under this article that are
attributable to a retail transaction for a service; and
(2) (3) the department collects under this article, less the amount
amounts described in subdivision (1). subdivisions (1) and (2).
(c) The department shall deposit the collections described in
subsection (b)(1) in the following manner:
(1) For state fiscal year 2017, the following:
(A) Fourteen and two hundred eighty-six thousandths percent
(14.286%) of the collections shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle highway account established under IC 8-14-1.
(B) Eighty-five and seven hundred fourteen thousandths
percent (85.714%) to the state general fund.
(2) For state fiscal year 2018, the following:
(A) Fourteen and two hundred eighty-six thousandths percent
(14.286%) of the collections shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle highway account established under IC 8-14-1.
(B) Fourteen and two hundred eighty-six thousandths percent
(14.286%) of the collections shall be deposited in the local
road and bridge matching grant fund established under
IC 8-23-30.
(C) Seventy-one and four hundred twenty-eight thousandths
percent (71.428%) to the state general fund.
(3) For state fiscal year 2019, the following:
(A) Fourteen and two hundred eighty-six thousandths percent
(14.286%) of the collections shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle highway account established under IC 8-14-1.
(B) Twenty-one and four hundred twenty-nine thousandths
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


percent (21.429%) of the collections shall be deposited in the
local road and bridge matching grant fund established under
IC 8-23-30.
(C) Sixty-four and two hundred eighty-five thousandths
percent (64.285%) shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(4) For state fiscal year 2020 and for each state fiscal year
thereafter, the following:
(A) Fourteen and two hundred eighty-six thousandths percent
(14.286%) of the collections shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle highway account established under IC 8-14-1.
(B) Twenty-one and four hundred twenty-nine thousandths
percent (21.429%) of the collections shall be deposited in the
local road and bridge matching grant fund established under
IC 8-23-30.
(C) The following shall be deposited in the state general fund:
(i) For state fiscal year 2020, fifty-three and five hundred
seventy-five thousandths percent (53.575%) shall be
deposited in the state general fund.
(ii) For state fiscal year 2021, forty-two and eight hundred
sixty-five thousandths percent (42.865%) shall be deposited
in the state general fund.
(iii) For state fiscal year 2022, thirty-two and one hundred
fifty-five thousandths percent (32.155%) shall be deposited
in the state general fund.
(iv) For state fiscal year 2023, twenty-one and four hundred
forty-five thousandths percent (21.445%) shall be deposited
in the state general fund.
(D) The following shall be deposited in the special
transportation flexibility fund established by IC 4-12-16.5-2:
(i) For state fiscal year 2020, eight and five hundred
sixty-eight thousands percent (8.568%) of the collections
shall be deposited in the special transportation flexibility
fund established by IC 4-12-16.5-2.
(ii) For state fiscal year 2021, twelve and eight hundred
fifty-two thousandths percent (12.852%) of the collections
shall be deposited in the special transportation flexibility
fund established by IC 4-12-16.5-2.
(iii) For state fiscal year 2022, twelve and eight hundred
fifty-two thousandths percent (12.852%) of the collections
shall be deposited in the special transportation flexibility
fund established by IC 4-12-16.5-2.
(iv) For state fiscal year 2023, eight and five hundred
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


sixty-eight thousands percent (8.568%) of the collections
shall be deposited in the special transportation flexibility
fund established by IC 4-12-16.5-2.
(E) The following shall be deposited in the state highway fund:
(i) For state fiscal year 2020, two and one hundred forty-two
thousandths percent (2.142%) of the collections shall be
deposited in the state highway fund.
(ii) For state fiscal year 2021, eight and five hundred
sixty-eight thousandths percent (8.568%) of the collections
shall be deposited in the state highway fund.
(iii) For state fiscal year 2022, nineteen and two hundred
seventy-eight thousandths percent (19.278%) of the
collections shall be deposited in the state highway fund.
(iv) For state fiscal year 2023, thirty-four and two hundred
seventy-two thousandths percent (34.272%) of the
collections shall be deposited in the state highway fund.
(v) For state fiscal year 2024 and for each state fiscal year
thereafter, sixty-four and two hundred eighty-five
thousandths percent (64.285%) of the collections shall be
deposited in the state highway fund.
(d) The department shall deposit those collections described in
subsection (b)(2) (b)(3) in the following manner:
(1) Ninety-nine and eight hundred thirty-eight thousandths
percent (99.838%) of the collections shall be paid into the state
general fund.
(2) Thirty-one thousandths of one percent (0.031%) of the
collections shall be deposited into the industrial rail service fund
established under IC 8-3-1.7-2.
(3) One hundred thirty-one thousandths of one percent (0.131%)
of the collections shall be deposited into the commuter rail service
fund established under IC 8-3-1.5-20.5.
(e) The department shall deposit the collections described in
subsection (b)(2) into the local revenue sharing fund established by
IC 6-1.2-3-2.
SECTION 51. IC 6-3.6-5-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.243-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), an
adopting body may impose a tax under section 6 of this chapter on the
adjusted gross income of local taxpayers in the county served by the
adopting body.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the portion of revenue
received from any tax imposed on the adjusted gross income of
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


local taxpayers for purposes of property tax relief under this
chapter, IC 6-3.6-7, or any other law, may not be distributed for
purposes of property tax relief under this chapter or any other law
after December 31, 2027.
SECTION 52. IC 6-3.6-6-3.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 125, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. (a) As used in this section,
"homestead" has the meaning set forth in IC 6-1.1-12-37.
(b) A county fiscal body may adopt an ordinance to impose a tax
rate for the purpose of funding property tax homestead credits to reduce
the property tax liability of taxpayers who own homesteads that are:
(1) located in the county; and
(2) eligible for a credit under IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5 that limits the
taxpayer's property tax liability for the property to one percent
(1%).
Revenue collected from a tax rate imposed under this section may only
be used to fund replacement of the county's property tax levy. Property
taxes imposed due to a referendum in which a majority of the voters in
the taxing unit imposing the property taxes approved the property taxes
are not eligible for a credit under this section.
(c) The tax rate must be in increments of one-hundredth of one
percent (0.01%) and may not exceed three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%).
(d) A tax imposed under this section shall be treated as property
taxes for all purposes. However, the department of local government
finance may not reduce:
(1) any taxing unit's maximum permissible property tax levy limit
under IC 6-1.1-18.5; or
(2) the approved property tax levy or rate for any fund;
by the amount of any credits granted under this chapter.
(e) The homestead credits shall be applied to the net property taxes
due on the homestead after the application of any credit granted under
IC 6-1.1, including any credit granted under IC 6-1.1-20.4 and
IC 6-1.1-20.6.
(f) The property tax credits must be applied uniformly to provide a
homestead credit for homesteads in the county.
(g) The county auditor shall allocate the amount of revenue applied
as tax credits under this section to the taxing units that imposed the
eligible property taxes against which the credits are applied.
(h) The department of local government finance shall assist county
fiscal bodies and county auditors in calculating credit percentages and
amounts.
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(i) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter, a
tax imposed under this section:
(1) may be imposed on the adjusted gross income of taxpayers
before January 1, 2028; 2027; and
(2) terminates and may not be imposed on the adjusted gross
income of taxpayers after December 31, 2027. 2026.
(j) This section expires January 1, 2028. 2027.
SECTION 53. IC 6-8.1-3-30 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2027]: Sec. 30. The department shall post:
(1) a notice received from the treasurer of state under
IC 6-1.2-6-3; and
(2) any resulting change in the state gross retail tax rate
imposed on services under IC 6-2.5-2-2(d);
on the department's website.
SECTION 54. IC 8-22-3.5-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. Notwithstanding any
other law:
(1) no airport development zone or allocation area may be
established, amended, or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for an airport development zone or
allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
SECTION 55. IC 20-26-7.1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 209, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) For purposes of this
section, "charter school" does not include a virtual charter school or an
adult high school.
(b) This chapter does not apply to the following:
(1) A school building that since July 1, 2011, is leased or loaned
by the school corporation that owns the school building to another
entity, if the entity is not a building corporation or other entity that
is related in any way to, or created by, the school corporation or
the governing body.
(2) A school corporation to which all of the following apply:
(A) The county auditor distributes revenue after May 10, 2023,
as required under IC 20-46-1-21 or IC 20-46-1-22 to each
eligible charter school.
(B) If the school corporation listed in IC 20-46-9-22 receives
revenue from a school safety referendum tax levy under
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


IC 20-46-9, the county auditor distributes revenue after May
10, 2023, as required under IC 20-46-9-22 to each charter
school described in IC 20-46-9-22(b).
The above subdivisions are intended to apply retroactively. No
referendums or distributed revenue prior to May 10, 2023, are
effective to provide exemption from this chapter.
(3) A school corporation to which all of the following apply:
(A) The school corporation approves a resolution after May
10, 2023, to impose an operating referendum tax levy under
IC 20-46-1 after May 10, 2023, that includes sharing the
revenue from the referendum tax levy in the amounts
described in clause (B) with each charter school that:
(i) a student who resides within the attendance area of the
school corporation attends; and
(ii) elects to participate in the referendum.
The above subdivisions are intended to apply retroactively. No
resolutions, referendums, or distributed revenue prior to May 10,
2023, are effective to provide exemption from this chapter.
(B) The amount of referendum tax levy revenue that the school
corporation is required to share with each charter school under
the resolution described in clause (A) is equal to the amount
determined applying the applicable formula under
IC 20-46-1-21. or IC 20-46-1-22.
(C) The referendum tax levy described in clause (A) is
approved by the voters.
(D) The school corporation distributes the amounts described
in clause (B) to each charter school described in clause (A).
(E) If the school corporation receives revenue from a school
safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9, the school
corporation shares the revenue from the school safety
referendum tax levy with each charter school that:
(i) a student who resides within the attendance area of the
school corporation attends; and
(ii) elects to participate in the referendum;
in an amount equal to the amount determined applying the
formula under IC 20-46-9-22(d).
(c) In order for any payment to a charter school to qualify as sharing
of proceeds from a referendum for purposes of exemption from
IC 20-26-7.1, the referendum must have been passed with prior notice
to voters of all amounts of referendum proceeds to be paid to charter
schools. Any claim of exemption based on payment of proceeds from
a referendum passed without such notice is void.
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


SECTION 56. IC 20-46-1-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law, after May 9, 2026, the governing body of a school
corporation may not adopt a resolution to impose an operating
referendum levy under section 8 or 8.5 of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, after December 31, 2027, no
operating referendum tax levy may imposed under this chapter.
SECTION 57. IC 20-46-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 215, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) Subject to subsections
(b), (e), and (f) and this chapter, the governing body of a school
corporation may adopt a resolution to place a referendum under this
chapter on the ballot for any of the following purposes:
(1) The governing body of the school corporation determines that
it cannot, in a calendar year, carry out its public educational duty
unless it imposes a referendum tax levy under this chapter.
(2) The governing body of the school corporation determines that
a referendum tax levy under this chapter should be imposed to
replace property tax revenue that the school corporation will not
receive because of the application of the credit under
IC 6-1.1-20.6.
(b) A resolution for a referendum described in
(1) section 21 of this chapter or
(2) section 22 of this chapter;
shall specify that a portion of the proceeds collected from the proposed
levy will be distributed to applicable charter schools in the manner
described under this chapter.
(c) The governing body of the school corporation shall certify a
copy of the resolution to place a referendum on the ballot to the
following:
(1) The department of local government finance, including:
(A) the language for the question required by section 10 of this
chapter, or in the case of a resolution to extend a referendum
levy certified to the department of local government finance
after March 15, 2016, section 10.1 of this chapter; and
(B) a copy of the revenue spending plan adopted under
subsection (f).
The governing body of the school corporation shall also provide
the county auditor's certification described in section 10(e) or
10.1(f) of this chapter, as applicable. The department of local
government finance shall post the values certified by the county
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


auditor to the department's website. The department shall review
the language for compliance with section 10 or 10.1 of this
chapter, whichever is applicable, and either approve or reject the
language. The department shall send its decision to the governing
body of the school corporation not more than ten (10) days after
the resolution is submitted to the department. If the language is
approved, the governing body of the school corporation shall
certify a copy of the resolution, including the language for the
question and the department's approval.
(2) The county fiscal body of each county in which the school
corporation is located (for informational purposes only).
(3) The circuit court clerk of each county in which the school
corporation is located.
(d) If a school safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9 has been
approved by the voters in a school corporation at any time in the
previous three (3) years, the school corporation may not:
(1) adopt a resolution to place a referendum under this chapter on
the ballot; or
(2) otherwise place a referendum under this chapter on the ballot.
(e) This subsection applies to a resolution described in section 21 or
22 of this chapter. Not later than sixty (60) days before the resolution
is voted on by the governing body, the school corporation shall contact
the department to determine the following:
(1) In the case of a resolution described in section 22 of this
chapter, whether the school corporation is exempt from revenue
sharing requirements under section 22(a)(2) of this chapter. If the
school corporation is determined to be exempt, the department
shall notify the school corporation, and the school corporation is
not required to contact charter schools concerning participation
under subsection (h), shall exclude distributions to charter schools
under section 22 of this chapter, and shall exclude charter schools
from the projection described in this subsection.
(2) If the school corporation is not determined to be exempt from
revenue sharing requirements under subdivision (1), the number
of students in kindergarten through grade 12 who:
(A) (1) have legal settlement in the school corporation but attend
a charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or adult high
schools; and
(B) (2) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
Not later than ten (10) days after receiving the request, the department
shall provide the school corporation with the requested information,
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


which shall be disaggregated for each particular charter school. Subject
to subsection (h), the resolution shall include a projection of the
amount that the school corporation expects, based on the information
provided by the department under this subsection, to be distributed to
a particular charter school under section 21 or 22 of this chapter.
(f) As part of the resolution described in subsection (a), the
governing body of the school corporation shall adopt a revenue
spending plan for the proposed referendum tax levy that includes:
(1) an estimate of the amount of annual revenue expected to be
collected if a levy is imposed under this chapter;
(2) the specific purposes for which the revenue collected from a
levy imposed under this chapter will be used;
(3) an estimate of the annual dollar amounts that will be expended
for each purpose described in subdivision (2); and
(4) for a resolution for a referendum that is described in section
21 or 22 of this chapter, the projected revenue that shall be
distributed to charter schools. The revenue spending plan shall
also take into consideration deviations in the proposed revenue
spending plan if the actual charter school distributions exceed or
are lower than the projected charter school distributions described
in subsection (e). The resolution shall include for each charter
school that elects to participate under subsection (h) information
described in subdivisions (1) through (3).
(g) A school corporation shall specify in its proposed budget the
school corporation's revenue spending plan adopted under subsection
(f) and annually present the revenue spending plan at its public hearing
on the proposed budget under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(h) This subsection applies to a resolution described in section 21
or 22 of this chapter. Except as provided in subsection (e), not later
than forty-five (45) days before the resolution is voted on by the
governing body, the school corporation shall contact each charter
school disclosed by the department to the school corporation under
subsection (e) to determine whether the charter school will,
(1) in the case of a resolution described in section 21 of this
chapter, elect to participate or
(2) in the case of a resolution described in section 22 of this
chapter, elect to not participate;
in the referendum. The notice must include the total amount of the
school corporation's expected need, the corresponding estimate for that
amount divided by the number of students enrolled in the school
corporation, and the date on which the governing body of the school
corporation will vote on the resolution. Not later than thirty (30) days
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


prior to the date that the resolution is to be voted on by the governing
body, the charter school must respond in writing to the school
corporation and to the department, which may be by electronic mail,
and, in the case of the school corporation, addressed to the
superintendent of the school corporation. A charter school that elects
to not participate in the referendum may not subsequently change that
election during the term of the referendum.
(i) If a charter school will not participate in the referendum, the
school corporation shall exclude distributions to the charter school
under this chapter and from the projection described in subsection (e).
If a charter school will participate in the referendum, the charter
school:
(1) must be included in the projection described in subsection (e);
and
(2) shall contribute a proportionate share of the cost to conduct
the referendum based on the total combined ADM of the school
corporation and any participating charter schools.
(j) This subsection applies to a resolution described in section 21 or
22 of this chapter. At least thirty (30) days before the referendum
submitted to the voters under this chapter is voted on by the public in
a general election, the school corporation that is pursuing the
referendum and any charter school that will participate under
subsection (h) shall post a referendum disclosure statement on each
school's respective website that contains the following information:
(1) The salaries by position within the school corporation or
charter school listed from highest salary to lowest salary and a
link to Gateway Indiana for access to individual salaries.
(2) An acknowledgment that the school corporation or charter
school is not committing any crime described in IC 35-44.1-1.
(3) A link to the school corporation's or charter school's most
recent state board of accounts audit on the state board of accounts'
website.
(4) The current enrollment of the school corporation or charter
school disaggregated by student group and race.
(5) The school corporation's or charter school's high school
graduation rate.
(6) The school corporation's or charter school's annual retention
rate for teachers for the previous five (5) years.
(k) Not later than July 15, 2025, the department of education shall
prescribe the manner in which a projection described in subsection (e)
shall be calculated.
(l) A charter school that begins operations after a resolution under
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


this section or section 8.5 of this chapter is voted on by the governing
body for a particular referendum may not receive an option to elect to
participate in that referendum during the term of that referendum.
SECTION 58. IC 20-46-1-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 216, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8.5. (a) A resolution to extend
a referendum levy must be:
(1) adopted by the governing body of a school corporation; and
(2) approved in a referendum under this chapter;
before December 31 of the final calendar year in which the school
corporation's previously approved referendum levy is imposed under
this chapter.
(b) For a resolution described in section 21 or 22 of this chapter that
is adopted under this section, the resolution must include the projected
charter school distributions described in section 8(e) of this chapter and
indicate the distributions to applicable charter schools in accordance
with this chapter.
SECTION 59. IC 20-46-1-21, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 221, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 21. (a) Subject to section 0.5
of this chapter, this section
(1) except as provided in subdivision (2), applies to revenue
received from a resolution that is approved by the governing body
to impose a referendum levy under section 8 or 8.5 of this chapter
after May 10, 2023, for a school corporation located in:
(A) (1) Lake County;
(B) (2) Marion County;
(C) (3) St. Joseph County; or
(D) (4) Vanderburgh County.
through the full term of the referendum levy; and
(2) does not apply to revenue received from a referendum levy if:
(A) the governing body of the school corporation approves the
referendum levy in a resolution adopted under section 8 or 8.5
of this chapter; and
(B) the referendum levy is imposed for the first time with
property taxes first due and payable in a calendar year
beginning after December 31, 2027.
(b) Subject to subsections (f) and (h), the county auditor in the
county in which the school corporation is located shall distribute an
amount of revenue as provided under subsection (e) from the revenue
collected from a tax levy imposed under this chapter by a school
corporation that is attributable to the territory of the school corporation
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


that is located within the boundaries of a county listed in subsection
(a)(1) to each charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or adult
high schools, that a student who resides within the attendance area of
the school corporation attends if the charter school elects to participate
in the referendum under section 8(h) of this chapter.
(c) The department shall provide the county auditor with data and
information necessary for the county auditor to determine:
(1) which charter schools are eligible to receive a distribution
under this section; and
(2) the number of students who:
(A) reside within the attendance area of the school corporation
who are included in the ADM for each charter school,
excluding virtual charter schools or adult high schools,
described in subdivision (1); and
(B) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
(d) The following schools are not eligible to receive a distribution
under this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
(e) For the purposes of the calculations made in this subsection,
each eligible school that has entered into an agreement with a school
corporation to participate as a participating innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 is considered to have an ADM that is
separate from the school corporation. The amount that the county
auditor shall distribute to a charter school, excluding virtual charter
schools or adult high schools, under this section is the amount
determined in the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools, that is eligible to receive a
distribution under this section, the number of students who reside
within the attendance area of the school corporation who are
currently included in the ADM of the charter school and receive
not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) the current ADM count for the school corporation; plus
(B) total number of all students who reside within the
attendance area of the school corporation who are currently
included in the ADM of a charter school, and receive not more
than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools.
STEP THREE: Determine the result of:
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(A) the STEP ONE amount; divided by
(B) the STEP TWO amount.
STEP FOUR: Determine the result of:
(A) the sum of:
(i) the STEP THREE amount; plus
(ii) any amount withheld in the previous year under
subsection (i); multiplied by
(B) the amount collected by the county auditor during the most
recent installment period that is attributable to the territory of
the school corporation that is located within the boundaries of
a county listed in subsection (a).
(f) A charter school is not eligible for a distribution under this
section from property tax revenue collected from a particular
referendum levy if the charter school does not have a certified fall
ADM count in the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year in which the public question for the referendum appears on the
ballot.
(g) Not later than August 15, 2025, and not later than August 15 of
each calendar year thereafter, the department shall provide to each
school corporation and eligible charter school an estimate of the
amount of property tax levy revenue the school corporation and charter
school are expected to receive under this section in the subsequent
calendar year based on the most recent fall ADM count.
(h) This subsection applies beginning with distributions of property
tax revenue under this section in 2026 and thereafter. In order to
receive a distribution under this section, the governing body of a
charter school shall, not later than October 15, 2025, and not later than
October 15 of each calendar year thereafter, adopt a budget for the
current school year. Not later than ten (10) days before its adoption, the
budget must be fixed and presented to the charter board in a public
meeting in the county in which the charter school is incorporated. Not
later than November 1, 2025, and not later than November 1 of each
calendar year thereafter, the governing body of the charter school shall
submit:
(1) the budget that is adopted under this subsection;
(2) the dates on which each requirement under this subsection
were met; and
(3) a statement from the governing body of the charter school
attesting that the dates provided in subdivision (2) are true and
accurate and that the budget was properly adopted under this
subsection;
to the charter authorizer for review and to the department of local
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


government finance to be posted publicly on the computer gateway
under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(i) If a charter school does not satisfy the requirements of subsection
(h) to receive distributions under this section during a calendar year, as
determined by the department of local government finance, the charter
school may not receive a distribution of property tax revenue in that
calendar year and the county auditor shall withhold the charter school's
distribution amount. The department of local government finance's
determination of compliance consists only of a confirmation that the
adopted budget and attestation statement are submitted not later than
the applicable date under subsection (h). Any distribution amount
withheld under this subsection shall be:
(1) added to the property tax revenue collections as described in
STEP TWO of subsection (e); and
(2) distributed among the school corporation and remaining
charter schools according to subsection (e);
in the calendar year that immediately follows the calendar year in
which the distribution amount was withheld.
SECTION 60. IC 20-46-1-22 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 22. (a) This section applies to revenue received from
a referendum levy if both of the following apply:
(1) The:
(A) governing body of the school corporation approves the
referendum levy in a resolution adopted under section 8 or 8.5
of this chapter; and
(B) resulting referendum levy is imposed for the first time with
property taxes first due and payable in a calendar year
beginning after December 31, 2027.
(2) The number of students who have legal settlement in the
school corporation but attend a charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools and adult high schools, and receive not more than
fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction is at least the greater of:
(A) one hundred (100) students; or
(B) two percent (2%) of the school corporation's spring ADM
count, excluding students who receive more than fifty percent
(50%) virtual instruction.
(b) As used in this section, "eligible charter school" means a charter
school attended by a student who:
(1) has legal settlement in a school corporation that imposes a
referendum levy under this chapter; and
(2) receives not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
However, the term does not include a virtual charter school or an adult
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


high school.
(c) The following schools are not eligible to receive, and may not be
considered in a calculation made for purposes of, a distribution under
this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
(d) Subject to subsections (j) and (l), the county auditor in the
county in which the school corporation is located shall distribute to
each eligible charter school, in the manner provided under this section,
an amount of revenue received from a tax levy imposed by a school
corporation under this chapter unless the charter school elects to not
participate in the referendum under section 8(h) of this chapter.
(e) For the purposes of the calculations made in this section, each
eligible charter school that has entered into an agreement with a school
corporation to participate as a participating innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 is considered to have an ADM that is
separate from the school corporation.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2028, and not later than January 1 of
each year thereafter, the department, in consultation with the
department of local government finance, shall determine, for each
school corporation, the corresponding percentages of revenue received
from the tax levy that must be distributed among the school corporation
and each eligible charter school according to the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each eligible charter school, the
number of students who:
(A) have legal settlement within the school corporation;
(B) are currently included in the fall ADM count for the
charter school; and
(C) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) the aggregate of the STEP ONE results for all eligible
charter schools with respect to the school corporation; plus
(B) the fall ADM count for the school corporation for students
receiving not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
STEP THREE: For each eligible charter school, determine the
result of:
(A) the applicable STEP ONE amount; divided by
(B) the STEP TWO amount;
expressed as a percentage.
STEP FOUR: Determine the sum of all the amounts computed
under STEP THREE and subtract the result from one hundred
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


percent (100%).
(g) The department shall provide to the county auditor, immediately
after calculation under subsection (g):
(1) each eligible charter school and the eligible charter school's
corresponding percentage calculated under STEP THREE of
subsection (f); and
(2) the percentage calculated under STEP FOUR of subsection (f)
for the school corporation.
(h) Subject to subsections (k) and (m), when the county auditor
distributes property tax revenue, the county auditor shall distribute to
the school corporation and each eligible charter school the amount
determined in the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine the amount collected in the most recent
installment period by the school corporation from the school
corporation's referendum levy imposed under this chapter.
STEP TWO: To determine the distribution for the school
corporation and each eligible charter school, determine the result
of:
(A) the sum of:
(i) the STEP ONE result; plus
(ii) any amount withheld in the previous year under
subsection (k); multiplied by
(B) the following percentage:
(i) In the case of an eligible charter school, the charter
school's percentage under STEP THREE of subsection (f).
(ii) In the case of the school corporation, the school
corporation's percentage under STEP FOUR of subsection
(f).
(i) Not later than August 15, 2027, and not later than August 15 of
each calendar year thereafter, the department shall provide to each
school corporation and each eligible charter school an estimate of the
amount of property tax levy revenue the school corporation and eligible
charter school are expected to receive under this section in the
subsequent calendar year based on the most recent fall ADM count.
(j) This subsection applies beginning with distributions of property
tax revenue under this section in 2028 and thereafter. In order to
receive a distribution under this section, the governing body of an
eligible charter school shall, not later than October 15, 2027, and not
later than October 15 of each calendar year thereafter, adopt a budget
for the current school year. Not later than ten (10) days before its
adoption, the budget must be fixed and presented to the charter board
in a public meeting in the county in which the eligible charter school
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


is incorporated. Not later than November 1, 2027, and not later than
November 1 of each calendar year thereafter, the governing body of the
charter school shall submit:
(1) the budget that is adopted under this subsection;
(2) the dates on which each requirement under this subsection
were met; and
(3) a statement from the governing body of the charter school
attesting that the dates provided in subdivision (2) are true and
accurate and that the budget was properly adopted under this
subsection;
to the charter authorizer for review and to the department of local
government finance to be posted publicly on the computer gateway
under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(k) If an eligible charter school does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection (j) to receive distributions under this section during a
calendar year, as determined by the department of local government
finance, the eligible charter school may not receive a distribution of
property tax revenue in that calendar year and the county auditor shall
withhold the eligible charter school's distribution amount. The
department of local government finance's determination of compliance
consists only of a confirmation that the adopted budget and attestation
statement are submitted not later than the applicable date under
subsection (j). Any distribution amount withheld under this subsection
shall be:
(1) added to the property tax revenue collections as described in
STEP TWO of subsection (h); and
(2) distributed among the school corporation and eligible charter
schools according to subsection (h);
in the calendar year that immediately follows the calendar year in
which the distribution amount was withheld.
(l) A charter school is not eligible for a distribution under this
section from property tax revenue collected from a particular
referendum levy if the charter school does not have a certified fall
ADM count in the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year in which the public question for the referendum appears on the
ballot.
SECTION 61. IC 20-46-1-23, AS ADDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 133, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 23. Subject to section 0.5 of
this chapter, but notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter
or any other law to the contrary, including any amendments made to
this chapter and IC 3-10-9-3 in the 2025 regular session of the general
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


assembly, the governing body of a school corporation that adopts a
resolution to place a referendum on the ballot under section 8 of this
chapter on or before June 30, 2025, is eligible to place the referendum
question on the ballot in an election held in the fall of calendar year
2025.
SECTION 62. IC 20-46-7-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. Notwithstanding any
other law, after December 31, 2027, a property tax levy may not be
imposed under this chapter.
SECTION 63. IC 20-46-7-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2017,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) Before January 1, 2027, the governing
body of each school corporation shall establish a levy in every calendar
year sufficient to pay all obligations.
(b) This subsection applies to a school corporation that consolidates
under IC 20-23-6-12.5. The governing body shall establish a levy for
each subunit (as defined in IC 20-23-6-0.5) in each calendar year
sufficient to pay the debts and obligations that the particular subunit
incurred before consolidating with one (1) or more school corporations
under IC 20-23-6-12.5.
SECTION 64. IC 20-46-8-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. Notwithstanding any
other law, after December 31, 2027, a property tax levy may not be
imposed under this chapter.
SECTION 65. IC 20-46-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 223, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) Before January 1, 2028,
a school corporation may impose an annual property tax levy for its
operations fund.
(b) For property taxes first due and payable in 2019, the maximum
permissible property tax levy a school corporation may impose for its
operations fund (IC 20-40-18) is the following:
STEP ONE: Determine the sum of the following:
(A) The 2018 maximum permissible transportation levy
determined under IC 20-46-4 (repealed January 1, 2019).
(B) The 2018 maximum permissible school bus replacement
levy determined under IC 20-46-5 (repealed January 1, 2019).
(C) The 2018 amount that would be raised from a capital
projects fund tax rate equal to the sum of:
(i) the maximum capital projects fund rate that the school
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


corporation was authorized to impose for 2018 under
IC 20-46-6 (repealed January 1, 2019), after any adjustment
under IC 6-1.1-18-12 (but excluding any rate imposed for
qualified utility and insurance costs); plus
(ii) the capital projects fund rate imposed for qualified utility
and insurance costs in 2018.
(D) For school corporations described in IC 36-10-13-7, the
2018 levy as provided in section 6 of this chapter (repealed
January 1, 2019) to provide funding for an art association.
(E) For a school corporation in a county having a population
of more than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) and less
than three hundred thousand (300,000), the 2018 levy as
provided in section 7 of this chapter (repealed January 1,
2019) to provide funding for a historical society.
(F) For a school corporation described in IC 36-10-14-1, the
2018 levy as provided in section 8 of this chapter (repealed
January 1, 2019) to provide funding for a public playground.
STEP TWO: Determine the product of:
(A) The amount determined in STEP ONE, after eliminating
the effects of temporary excessive levy appeals and any other
temporary adjustments made to each of these levies for 2018
(regardless of whether the school corporation imposed the
entire amount of that maximum permissible levy for the
previous year); multiplied by
(B) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
STEP THREE: Determine the result of the following:
(A) Determine the sum of:
(i) the amount determined in STEP TWO; plus
(ii) the amount granted due to an appeal to increase the levy
for transportation for 2019.
(B) Make the school bus replacement adjustment for 2019.
(c) After 2019, the maximum permissible property tax levy a school
corporation may impose for its operations fund for a particular year is
the following:
STEP ONE: Determine the product of:
(A) the maximum permissible property tax levy for the school
corporation's operations fund for the previous year, after
eliminating the effects of temporary excessive levy appeals
and any other temporary adjustments made to the levy for the
previous year (regardless of whether the school corporation
imposed the entire amount of the maximum permissible levy
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


for the previous year); multiplied by
(B) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
STEP TWO: Determine the result of the following:
(A) Determine the sum of:
(i) the amount determined in STEP ONE; plus
(ii) the amount granted due to an appeal to increase the
maximum permissible operations fund levy for the year
under section 3 of this chapter for transportation (before its
expiration).
(B) Make the school bus replacement adjustment permitted by
section 3 of this chapter.
SECTION 66. IC 20-46-8-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 12. (a) This section applies to revenue collected after
December 31, 2027, from a tax levy imposed under this chapter only
if the number of students who have legal settlement in a school
corporation but attend a charter school, excluding virtual charter
schools and adult high schools, and receive not more than fifty percent
(50%) virtual instruction, is at least the greater of:
(1) one hundred (100) students; or
(2) two percent (2%) of the school corporation's spring ADM
count, excluding students who receive more than fifty percent
(50%) virtual instruction.
(b) As used in this section, "eligible charter school" means a charter
school attended by a student who:
(1) has legal settlement in a school corporation that imposes a tax
levy under this chapter; and
(2) receives not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
However, the term does not include a virtual charter school or an adult
high school.
(c) The following schools are not eligible to receive, and may not be
considered in a calculation made for purposes of, a distribution under
this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
(d) Beginning in calendar year 2028, and in each calendar year
thereafter, and subject to subsection (j), the county auditor shall
distribute to each eligible charter school in the manner provided under
this section an amount of revenue received from a tax levy imposed by
a school corporation under this chapter.
(e) For the purposes of the calculations made in this section, each
eligible charter school that has entered into an agreement with a school
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


corporation to participate as a participating innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 is considered to have an ADM that is
separate from the school corporation.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2028, and not later than January 1 of
each year thereafter, the department, in consultation with the
department of local government finance, shall determine, for each
school corporation, the corresponding percentages of revenue received
from the tax levy that must be distributed among the school corporation
and each eligible charter school according to the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each eligible charter school, the
number of students who:
(A) have legal settlement within the school corporation;
(B) are currently included in the fall ADM count for the
charter school; and
(C) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) the aggregate of the STEP ONE results for all eligible
charter schools with respect to the school corporation; plus
(B) the fall ADM count for the school corporation for students
receiving not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
STEP THREE: For each eligible charter school, determine the
result of:
(A) the applicable STEP ONE amount; divided by
(B) the STEP TWO amount;
expressed as a percentage.
STEP FOUR: Determine the sum of all the amounts computed
under STEP THREE and subtract the result from one hundred
percent (100%).
(g) The department shall provide to the county auditor, immediately
after calculation under subsection (f):
(1) each eligible charter school and the eligible charter school's
corresponding percentage calculated under STEP THREE of
subsection (f); and
(2) the percentage calculated under STEP FOUR of subsection (f)
for the school corporation.
(h) Subject to subsections (j) and (l), the county auditor shall
distribute to the school corporation and each eligible charter school the
amount determined in the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine the amount collected in the most recent
installment period by the school corporation from the school
corporation's operations fund levy imposed under this chapter.
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


STEP TWO: To determine the distribution for the school
corporation and each eligible charter school, determine the result
of:
(A) the sum of:
(i) the STEP ONE result; plus
(ii) any amount withheld in the previous year under
subsection (k); multiplied by
(B) the following percentage:
(i) In the case of an eligible charter school, the charter
school's percentage under STEP THREE of subsection (f).
(ii) In the case of the school corporation, the school
corporation's percentage under STEP FOUR of subsection
(f).
(i) Not later than August 15, 2027, and not later than August 15 of
each calendar year thereafter, the department shall provide to each
school corporation and each eligible charter school an estimate of the
amount of property tax levy revenue the school corporation and eligible
charter school are expected to receive under this section in the
subsequent calendar year based on the most recent fall ADM count.
(j) Beginning with distributions of property tax revenue under this
section in 2028 and thereafter, in order to receive a distribution under
this section, the governing body of an eligible charter school shall, not
later than October 15, 2027, and not later than October 15 of each
calendar year thereafter, adopt a budget for the current school year. Not
later than ten (10) days before its adoption, the budget must be fixed
and presented to the charter board in a public meeting in the county in
which the eligible charter school is incorporated. Not later than
November 1, 2027, and not later than November 1 of each calendar
year thereafter, the governing body of the charter school shall submit:
(1) the budget that is adopted under this subsection;
(2) the dates on which each requirement under this subsection
was met; and
(3) a statement from the governing body of the charter school
attesting that the dates provided in subdivision (2) are true and
accurate and that the budget was properly adopted under this
subsection;
to the charter authorizer for review and to the department of local
government finance to be posted publicly on the computer gateway
under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(k) If an eligible charter school does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection (j) to receive distributions under this section during a
calendar year, as determined by the department of local government
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


finance, the eligible charter school may not receive a distribution of
property tax revenue in that calendar year and the county auditor shall
withhold the eligible charter school's distribution amount. The
department of local government finance's determination of compliance
consists only of a confirmation that the adopted budget and attestation
statement are submitted not later than the applicable date under
subsection (j). Any distribution amount withheld under this subsection
shall be:
(1) added to the property tax revenue collections as described in
STEP TWO of subsection (h); and
(2) distributed among the school corporation and remaining
eligible charter schools according to subsection (h);
in the calendar year that immediately follows the calendar year in
which the distribution amount was withheld.
(l) This subsection applies only to distributions under subsection (h)
in calendar years 2028, 2029, and 2030 to an eligible charter school.
Instead of the amount determined under subsection (h) for a
distribution to a particular eligible charter school from the revenue
collected from the tax levy imposed under this chapter by a particular
school corporation, the county auditor shall make distributions
according to the following:
(1) For a distribution in 2028, the county auditor shall distribute
an amount for a particular eligible charter school equal to:
(A) the applicable result of STEP TWO of subsection (h) for
the eligible charter school; multiplied by
(B) twenty-five hundredths (0.25).
(2) For a distribution in 2029, the county auditor shall distribute
an amount for a particular eligible charter school equal to:
(A) the applicable result of STEP TWO of subsection (h) for
the eligible charter school; multiplied by
(B) five-tenths (0.5).
(3) For a distribution in 2030, the county auditor shall distribute
an amount for a particular eligible charter school equal to:
(A) the applicable result of STEP TWO of subsection (h) for
the eligible charter school; multiplied by
(B) seventy-five hundredths (0.75).
Any amount of property tax revenue collected from the tax levy
imposed under this chapter by a particular school corporation that
remains after making the distributions according to this subsection
shall be distributed to the school corporation and are in addition to the
amount distributed to the school corporation under subsection (h) for
the applicable year. This subsection expires July 1, 2032.
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


SECTION 67. IC 20-46-9-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law, after May 9, 2026, the governing body of a school
corporation may not adopt a resolution to impose a school safety
referendum levy under section 6 or 7 of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, after December 31, 2027, no
school safety referendum tax levy may be imposed under this
chapter.
SECTION 68. IC 20-46-9-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 232, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 22. (a) Subject to section 0.5
of this chapter, this section
(1) applies to revenue received from a resolution that is approved
by the governing body to impose a referendum levy under section
6 or 7 of this chapter after May 10, 2023, for a school corporation
located in:
(A) (1) Lake County;
(B) (2) Marion County;
(C) (3) St. Joseph County; or
(D) (4) Vanderburgh County.
through the full term of the referendum levy; and
(2) does not apply to revenue received from a referendum levy if:
(A) the governing body of the school corporation approves the
referendum levy in a resolution adopted under section 6 or 7
of this chapter; and
(B) the referendum levy is imposed for the first time with
property taxes first due and payable in a calendar year
beginning after December 31, 2027.
(b) The county auditor shall distribute an amount under subsection
(d) to each charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or adult
high schools, that a student who resides within the attendance area of
the school corporation attends if the charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools, elects to participate in the
referendum under section 6(i) of this chapter. The department shall
provide the county auditor with data and information necessary for the
county auditor to determine:
(1) which charter schools, excluding virtual charter schools or
adult high schools, are eligible to receive a distribution under this
section; and
(2) the number of all students who reside within the attendance
area of the school corporation who are included in the ADM for
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


each charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or adult
high schools, described in subdivision (1).
(c) The following schools are not eligible to receive a distribution
under this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
(d) For the purposes of the calculations made in this subsection,
each eligible school that has entered into an agreement with a school
corporation to participate as a participating innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 is considered to have an ADM that is
separate from the school corporation. The amount that the county
auditor shall distribute to a charter school, excluding virtual charter
schools or adult high schools, under this section is the amount
determined in the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools, that is eligible to receive a
distribution under this section, the number of students who reside
within the attendance area of the school corporation who are
currently included in the ADM of the charter school.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) the current ADM count for the school corporation; plus
(B) the total number of students who reside within the
attendance area of the school corporation who are currently
included in the ADM of a charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools.
STEP THREE: Determine the result of:
(A) the STEP ONE amount; divided by
(B) the STEP TWO amount.
STEP FOUR: Determine the result of:
(A) the STEP THREE amount; multiplied by
(B) the amount collected by the county auditor during the most
recent installment period.
(e) If a charter school receives a distribution under this section, the
distribution may be used only for the purposes described in
IC 20-40-20-6(a).
SECTION 69. IC 36-2-15-0.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.1. (a) This section applies to
the office of a county assessor who is serving on May 10, 2026.
(b) Upon the expiration of a county assessor's term, the office of
county assessor is abolished.
(c) Upon the expiration of a county assessor's term, all the
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


powers and duties of the county assessor are transferred to the
county auditor.
(d) Upon the expiration of a county assessor's term, all of the
following are transferred to the county auditor:
(1) All employment positions, as of the expiration of a county
assessor's term, of all employees of the county assessor.
(2) The real and personal property of the county assessor.
(3) The obligations outstanding, as of the expiration of a
county assessor's term, of the county assessor.
(4) The funds of the county assessor.
(e) The county auditor shall interview, or give the opportunity
to interview to, each individual who:
(1) is, as of the expiration of a county assessor's term, an
employee of the county assessor; and
(2) applies for an employment position referred to in
subsection (d)(1).
SECTION 70. IC 36-2-15-0.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.2. (a) Each county assessor
whose duties will be transferred under section 0.1 of this chapter
shall:
(1) organize the records of the assessor's office relating to the
assessment of tangible property in a manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance; and
(2) transfer the records upon the expiration of a county
assessor's term as directed by the department of local
government finance.
(b) The department of local government finance shall determine
a procedure and schedule for the transfer of the records and
operations from the county assessor to the county auditor. The
assessors shall assist each other and coordinate their efforts to:
(1) ensure an orderly transfer of all records; and
(2) provide for an uninterrupted and professional transition
of any functions of assessors that remain following the
abolishment of the imposition of property tax under IC 6-1.2
and that are consistent with this chapter, IC 6-1.1, and the
directions of the department of local government finance.
SECTION 71. IC 36-2-15-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2015,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A county assessor shall be elected under
IC 3-10-2-13 by the voters of the county.
(b) To be eligible to serve as an assessor, an individual must meet
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


the following qualifications before taking office:
(1) If the individual has never held the office of county assessor,
the individual must have attained a level two assessor-appraiser
certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(2) If the individual has held the office of county assessor, the
individual must have attained a level three assessor-appraiser
certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(c) A county assessor must reside within the county as provided in
Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of Indiana. The
assessor forfeits office if the assessor ceases to be a resident of the
county.
(d) The term of office of a county assessor is four (4) years,
beginning January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is
elected and qualified.
(e) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 72. IC 36-2-15-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2008,
SECTION 692, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) Subject to subsection (b),
the assessor shall keep the assessor's office in a building provided at
the county seat by the county executive. The assessor shall keep the
office open for business during regular business hours on every day of
the year except Sundays and legal holidays. However, the assessor may
close the office on days specified by the county executive according to
custom and practice of the county.
(b) After June 30, 2008, the county assessor may establish one (1)
or more satellite offices in the county.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 73. IC 36-2-15-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2015,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Subject to section 0.1 of this chapter, the
county assessor shall perform the functions assigned by statute to the
county assessor, including the following:
(1) Countywide equalization.
(2) Selection and maintenance of a countywide computer system.
(3) Certification of gross assessments to the county auditor.
(4) Discovery of omitted property.
(5) In
(A) a township in which the transfer of duties of the elected
township assessor is required by subsection (c); or
(B) a township in which the duties relating to the assessment
of tangible property are not required to be performed by a
township assessor elected under IC 36-6-5,
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


performance of the assessment duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1.
(b) A transfer of duties between assessors does not affect:
(1) any assessment, assessment appeal, or other official action
made by an assessor before the transfer; or
(2) any pending action against, or the rights of any party that may
possess a legal claim against, an assessor that is not described in
subdivision (1).
Any assessment, assessment appeal, or other official action of an
assessor made by the assessor within the scope of the assessor's official
duties before the transfer is considered as having been made by the
assessor to whom the duties are transferred.
(c) If the individual elected to the office of township assessor has
not attained the assessor-appraiser certification level required by
IC 36-6-5-1 before the date the term of office begins, the assessment
duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1 that would otherwise be performed in the
township by the township assessor are transferred to the county
assessor on that date. If assessment duties in a township are transferred
to the county assessor under this subsection, those assessment duties
are transferred back to the township assessor if at a later election an
individual who has attained the assessor-appraiser certification level
required by IC 36-6-5-1 is elected to the office of township assessor.
SECTION 74. IC 36-2-15-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.219-2007,
SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. (a) Each county assessor,
elected township assessor, or township trustee-assessor whose
assessment duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1 will be transferred under
section 5 of this chapter shall:
(1) organize the records of the assessor's office relating to the
assessment of tangible property in a manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance; and
(2) transfer the records as directed by the department of local
government finance.
(b) The department of local government finance shall determine a
procedure and schedule for the transfer of the records and operations.
The assessors shall assist each other and coordinate their efforts to:
(1) ensure an orderly transfer of all records; and
(2) provide for an uninterrupted and professional transition of the
property assessment functions consistent with this chapter and the
directions of the department of local government finance.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 75. IC 36-6-5-0.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.3. (a) This section applies to the office of
a township assessor who is serving on May 10, 2026.
(b) Upon the expiration of a township assessor's term, the office
of township assessor is abolished.
(c) Upon the expiration of a township assessor's term, all the
powers and duties of the township assessor are transferred to the
county auditor of the county in which the township is located.
(d) Upon the expiration of a township assessor's term, all of the
following are transferred to the county auditor:
(1) All employment positions, as of the expiration of a
township assessor's term, of all employees of each township
assessor in the county.
(2) The real and personal property of each township assessor
in the county.
(3) The obligations outstanding, as of the expiration of a
township assessor's term, of each township assessor in the
county.
(4) The funds of each township assessor in the county.
(e) The county auditor shall interview, or give the opportunity
to interview to, each individual who:
(1) is, as of the expiration of a township assessor's term, an
employee of a township assessor in the county; and
(2) applies for an employment position referred to in
subsection (d)(1).
SECTION 76. IC 36-6-5-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Each township assessor whose
duties will be transferred under section 0.3 of this chapter shall:
(1) organize the records of the assessor's office relating to the
assessment of tangible property in a manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance; and
(2) transfer the records upon the expiration of a township
assessor's term, as directed by the department of local
government finance.
(b) The department of local government finance shall determine
a procedure and schedule for the transfer of the records and
operations from the township assessor to the county auditor. The
assessors shall assist each other and coordinate their efforts to:
(1) ensure an orderly transfer of all records; and
(2) provide for an uninterrupted and professional transition
of any functions of assessors that remain following the
abolishment of the imposition of property tax under IC 6-1.2
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


and that are consistent with this chapter, IC 6-1.1, and the
directions of the department of local government finance.
SECTION 77. IC 36-6-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2015,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) Subject to subsection (g), before 2009,
a township assessor shall be elected under IC 3-10-2-13 by the voters
of each township:
(1) having:
(A) a population of more than eight thousand (8,000); or
(B) an elected township assessor or the authority to elect a
township assessor before January 1, 1979; and
(2) in which the number of parcels of real property on January 1,
2008, is at least fifteen thousand (15,000).
(b) Subject to subsection (g), before 2009, a township assessor shall
be elected under IC 3-10-2-14 (repealed effective July 1, 2008) in each
township:
(1) having a population of more than five thousand (5,000) but
not more than eight thousand (8,000), if:
(A) the legislative body of the township, by resolution,
declares that the office of township assessor is necessary; and
(B) the resolution is filed with the county election board not
later than the first date that a declaration of candidacy may be
filed under IC 3-8-2; and
(2) in which the number of parcels of real property on January 1,
2008, is at least fifteen thousand (15,000).
(c) Subject to subsection (g), a township government that is created
by merger under IC 36-6-1.5 shall elect only one (1) township assessor
under this section.
(d) Subject to subsection (g), after 2008 a township assessor shall
be elected under IC 3-10-2-13 only by the voters of each township in
which:
(1) the number of parcels of real property on January 1, 2008, is
at least fifteen thousand (15,000); and
(2) the transfer to the county assessor of the assessment duties
prescribed by IC 6-1.1 is disapproved in the referendum under
IC 36-2-15.
(e) The township assessor must reside within the township as
provided in Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of
Indiana. The assessor forfeits office if the assessor ceases to be a
resident of the township.
(f) The term of office of a township assessor is four (4) years,
beginning January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


elected and qualified. However, the term of office of a township
assessor elected at a general election in which no other township
officer is elected ends on December 31 after the next election in which
any other township officer is elected.
(g) To be eligible to serve as a township assessor, an individual
must meet the following qualifications before taking office:
(1) If the individual has never held the office of township
assessor, the individual must have attained a level two
assessor-appraiser certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(2) If the individual has held the office of township assessor, the
individual must have attained a level three assessor-appraiser
certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(h) After June 30, 2008, the county assessor shall perform the
assessment duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1 in a township in which the
number of parcels of real property on January 1, 2008, is less than
fifteen thousand (15,000).
(i) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 78. IC 36-6-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2008,
SECTION 711, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b) and section 0.3 of this chapter, the assessor shall
perform the duties prescribed by statute, including assessment duties
prescribed by IC 6-1.1.
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply if the duties of the township
assessor have been transferred to the county assessor as described in
IC 6-1.1-1-24 or IC 36-2-15.
SECTION 79. IC 36-6-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2015,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) Before July 1, 2017, an employee of a
township assessor who performs real property assessing duties must
have attained the level of certification under IC 6-1.1-35.5 that the
township assessor is required to attain under section 1(g) of this
chapter.
(b) After June 30, 2017, an employee of a township assessor who is
responsible for placing an assessed valuation on real property must
have attained the certification of a level three assessor-appraiser under
IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(c) This subsection applies after June 30, 2017. If the township
assessor has not attained the certification of a level three
assessor-appraiser under IC 6-1.1-35.5, the township fiscal body shall
authorize either of the following:
(1) The appointment of at least one (1) deputy or employee who
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


has attained the certification of a level three assessor-appraiser
under IC 6-1.1-35.5.
(2) Contracting with a person who has attained, or who employs
for purposes of the contract an individual who has attained, the
certification of a level three assessor-appraiser under
IC 6-1.1-35.5. The individual under contract with the township
assessor under this subdivision shall assist the township assessor
with assessment duties as determined by the township assessor.
Payment for the deputy, employee, or contractor shall be made from the
budget for the township assessor.
(d) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 80. IC 36-7-13-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law:
(1) no district or allocation area may be established, amended,
or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for a district or allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
(b) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 81. IC 36-7-14-0.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.7. (a) As used in this section,
"project area" refers to:
(1) an area needing redevelopment;
(2) a redevelopment project area;
(3) an urban renewal project area;
(4) an economic development area;
(5) an area including a project for housing or age-restricted
housing;
(6) an area including a residential housing development
program; and
(7) any other development district or program by any other
name that is described in this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law:
(1) no project area or allocation area may be established,
amended, or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for a project area or allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(c) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 82. IC 36-7-14.5-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law:
(1) no economic development area, special taxing district, or
allocation area may be established, amended, or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for an economic development area,
special taxing district, or allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
(b) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 83. IC 36-7-15.1-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) As used in this section,
"project area" refers to:
(1) an area needing redevelopment;
(2) a redevelopment project area;
(3) an urban renewal project area;
(4) an economic development area;
(5) an area including a project for housing or age-restricted
housing;
(6) an area including a residential housing development
program; and
(7) any other development district or program by any other
name that is described in this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law:
(1) no project area or allocation area may be established,
amended, or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for a project area or allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
(c) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 84. IC 36-7-30-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law:
(1) no special taxing district or allocation area may be
established, amended, or renewed; and
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for a special taxing district or
allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
(b) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 85. IC 36-7-30.5-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law:
(1) no military base development area or allocation area may
be established, amended, or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for a military base development
area or allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
(b) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 86. IC 36-7-32-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law:
(1) no certified technology park or allocation area may be
established, amended, or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for a certified technology park or
allocation area;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
(b) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
SECTION 87. IC 36-7.5-4.5-0.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.2. (a) Notwithstanding any
other law:
(1) no allocation area capturing property tax revenue may be
established, amended, or renewed; and
(2) no bonds, leases, or other obligations may be issued,
entered into, or extended for an allocation area capturing
property tax revenue;
under this chapter after May 9, 2026.
(b) This section may not be construed to prohibit the refunding
or refinancing of obligations incurred before May 10, 2026.
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125


SECTION 88. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027] (a) For purposes of
IC 6-2.5, as amended by this act, with respect to a transaction in
which services are delivered before July 1, 2027, and after June 30,
2027, by a retail merchant, only transactions for which the charges
are collected on original statements and billings dated after June
30, 2027, shall be considered as having occurred after June 30,
2027.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2029.
SECTION 89. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The legislative
services agency shall prepare legislation for introduction in the
2027 regular session of the general assembly to make appropriate
changes in statutes that are required by this act.
(b) This SECTION expires December 31, 2027.
SECTION 90. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1288—LS 6962/DI 125